[6501]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) visited a person from amongst the Muslims in order to inquire (about his health) who had grown feeble like the chicken. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Did you supplicate for anything or beg of Him about that? He said: Yes. I used to utter (these words): Impose punishment upon me earlier in this world, what Thou art going to impose upon me in the Hereafter. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Hallowed be Allah, you have neither the power nor forbearance to take upon yourself (the burden of His Punishment). Why did you not say this: O Allah, grant us good in the world and good in the Hereafter, and save us from the torment of Fire. He (the Holy Prophet) made this supplication (for him) and he was all right.
[6502]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Humaid with the same chain of transmitters, but with a slight variation of wording.
[6503]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) visited a person from amongst his Companions who had grown as feeble as the chicken. The rest of the hadith is the same, but with this variation that he (the Holy Prophet) said: You have not power enough to undergo the torment imposed by Allah. And there is no mention of: He supplicated Allah for him and He cured him.
[6504]
This hadith had been transmitted on the authority of Anas through another chain of narrators.
[6505]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying Allah has mobile (squads) of angels, who have no other work (to attend to but) to follow the assemblies of Dhikr and when they find such assemblies in which there is Dhikr (of Allah) they sit in them and some of them surround the others with their wings till the space between them and the sky of the world is fully covered, and when they disperse (after the assembly of Dhikr is adjourned) they go upward to the heaven and Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, asks them although He is best informed about them: Where have you come from? They say: We come from Thine servants upon the earth who had been glorifying Thee (reciting Subhan Allah), uttering Thine Greatness (saying Allah o-Akbar) and uttering Thine Oneness (La ilaha ill Allah) and praising Thee (uttering al-Hamdu Lillah) and begging of Thee. Be would say : What do they beg of Me? They would say: They beg of Thee the Paradise of Thine. He (God) would say : Have they seen My Paradise ? They said : No, our Lord. He would say : (What it would be then) if they were to see Mine Paradise ? They (the angels) said : They seek Thine protection. He (the Lord) would say: Against what do they seek protection of Mine? They (the angels) would say: Our Lord, from the Hell-Fire. He (the Lord) would say: Have they seen My Fire? They would say: No. He (the Lord) would say: What it would be if they were to see My Fire ? They would say : They beg of Thee forgiveness. He would say: I grant pardon to them, and confer upon them what they ask for and grant them protection against which they seek protection. They (the angels) would again say: Our Lord, there is one amongst them such and such simple servant who happened to pass by (that assembly) and sat there along with them (who had been participating in that assembly). He (the Lord) would say: I also grant him pardon, for they are a people the seat-fellows of whom are in no way unfortunate.
[6506]
Qatada asked Anas which Supplication Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) frequently made. He said: The supplication that he (the Holy Prophet made very frequently is this: "O Allah, grant us the good in this world and the good in the Hereafter and save us from the torment of Hell-Fire." He (Qatada) said that whenever Anas had to supplicate he made this very supplication, and whenever he (intended) to make another supplication he (inserted) this very supplication in that.
[6507]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to supplicate (in these words): "Our Lord, grant us the good in this world and the good in the Hereafter and save us from the torment of Hell Fire."
[6508]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who uttered these words: "There is no god but Allah, the One, having no partner with Him. Sovereignty belongs to Him and all the praise is due to Him, and He is Potent over everything" one hundred times every day there is a reward of emancipating ten slaves for him, and there are recorded hundred virtues to his credit, and hundred vices are blotted out from his scroll, and that is a safeguard for him against the Satan on that day till evening and no one brings anything more excellent than this, except one who has done more than this (who utters these words more than one hundred times and does more good acts) and he who utters: "Hallowed be Allah, and all praise is due to Him," one hundred times a day, his sins are obliterated even if they are equal to the extent of the foam of the ocean.
[6509]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who recites in the morning and in the evening (these words): "Hallowed be Allah and all praise is due to Him" one hundred times, he would not bring on the Day of Resurrection anything excellent than this except one who utters these words or utters more than these words.
[6510]
'Amr b. Maimun reported: He who uttered: "There is no god but Allah, the One, having no partner with Him, His is the Sovereignty and all praise is due to Him and He is Potent over everything" ten times, he is like one who emancipated four slaves from the progeny of Isma'il. Rabi' b. Khuthaim narrated a hadith like this. Sha'bi reported: I said to Rabi': From whom did you hear it? He said: From 'Amr b. Maimun. I came to 'Amr b. Maimun and said to him: From whom did you hear this hadith? He said: from Ibn Abi Laila. I came to Ibn Abi Laila and said to him: From whom did you hear this hadith? He said: From Abu Ayyub Ansari, who narrated from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[6511]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Two are the expressions which are light on the tongue, but heavy in scale, dear to the Compassionate One: "Hallowed be Allah and praise is due to Him"; "Hallowed be Allah, the Great."
[6512]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The uttering of (these words): "Hallowed be Allah; all praise is due to Allah, there is no god but Allah and Allah is the Greatest," is dearer to me than anything over which the sun rises.
[6513]
Mu'sab b. Sa'd reported on the authority of his father that a desert Arab came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said to him: Teach me the words which I should (often) utter. He said: Utter, "There is no god but Allah, the One, having no partner with Him. Allah is the Greatest of the great and all praise is due to Him. Hallowed be Allah, the Lord of the worlds, there is no Might and Power but that of Allah, the All-Powerful and the Wise." He (that desert Arab) said: These all (glorify) my Lord. But what about me? Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: You should say: "O Allah, grant me pardon, have mercy upon me, direct me to righteousness and provide me sustenance." Musa (one of the narrators) said : I think he also said: "Grant me safety." But I cannot say for certain whether he said this or not. Ibn Abi Shaiba has not made a mention of the words of Musa in his narration.
[6514]
Abu Malik Ashaja'i reported on the authority of his father that whenever a person embraced Islam, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) instructed him to recilte: "O Allah, grant me pardon, have mercy upon me, direct me to the path of righteousness and provide me sustenance."
[6515]
Abu Malik reported on the authority of his father that when a person embraced Islam, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to teach him how to observe prayer and then commanded him to supplicate in these words: "O Allah, grant me pardon, have mercy upon me, direct me to the path of righteousness, grant me protection and provide me sustenance."
[6516]
Abu Malik reported on the authority Of his father that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying to the person who bad come to him and asked him as to how he should beg his Lord, that he should utter these words: "O Allah, grant me pardon, have mercy upon me, protect me, provide me sustenance," and he collected his fingers together except his thumb and said: It is in these words (that there is supplication) which sums up for you (the good) of this world and that of the Hereafter.
[6517]
Mus'ab b. Sa'd reported that his father told him that he had been in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that he said: Is one amongst you powerless to get one thousand virtues every day. Amongst those who had been sitting there, one asked: How one amongst us can get one thousand virtues every day? He said: Recite: "Hallowed be Allah" one hundred times for (by reciting them) one thousand virtues are recorded (to your credit) and one tbousand vices are blotted out.
[6518]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who alleviates the suffering of a brother out of the sufferings of the world, Allah would alleviate his suffering from the sufferings of the Day of Resurrection, and he who finds relief for one who is hard pressed, Allah would make things easy for him in the Hereafter, and he who conceals (the faults) of a Muslim, Allah would conceal his faults in the world and in the Hereafter. Allah is at the back of a servant so long as the servant is at the back of his brother, and he who treads the path in search of know- ledge, Allah would make that path easy, leading to Paradise for him and those persons who assemble in the house among the houses of Allah (mosques) and recite the Book of Allah and they learn and teach the Qur'an (among themselves) there would descend upon them the tranquillity and mercy would cover them and the angels would surround them and Allah makes a mention of them in the presence of those near Him, and he who is slow-paced in doing good deeds, his (high) descent does not make him go ahead.
[6519]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[6520]
Agharr Abi Muslim reported: I bear witness to the fact that both Abu Huraira and Abu Sa'id Khudri were present when Allah's Messenger may peace be upon him) said: The people do not sit but they are surrounded by angels and covered by Mercy, and there descends upon them tranquillity as they remember Allah, and Allah makes a mention of them to those who are near Him. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[6521]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported that Mu'awiya went to a circle in the mosque and said : What makes you sit here ? They said: We are sitting here in order to re- member Allah. He said: I adjure you by Allah (to tell me whether you are sitting here for this very purpose) ? They said: By Allah, we are sitting here for this very purpose. Thereupon, he said: I have not demanded you to take an oath, because of any allegation against you and none of my rank in the eye of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) is the narrator of so few ahadith as I am. The fact is that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went out to the circle of his Companions and said: What makes you sit? They said: We are sitting here in order to remember Allah and to praise Him for He guided us to the path of Islam and He conferred favours upgn us. Thereupon he adjured by Allah and asked if that only was the purpose of their sitting there. They said: By Allah, we are not sitting here but for this very purpose, whereupon he (the Messenger) said: I am not asking you to take an oath because of any allegation against you but for the fact that Gabriel came to me and he informed me that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, was talking to the angels about your magnificence.
[6522]
Al-Agharr al-Muzani, who was one amongst the Companions (of the Holy Prophet) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: There is (at times) some sort of shade upon my heart, and I seek forgiveness from Allah a hundred times a day.
[6523]
Al-Agharr al-Muzani who was from amongst the Companions of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) reported that Ibn 'Umar stated to him that Allah's Messenger (may peace 'be upon him) said: O people, seek repentance from Allah. Verily, I seek repentance from Him a hundred times a day.
[6524]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[6525]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as say- ing: He who seeks repentance (from the Lord) before the rising of the sun from the west (before the Day of Resurrection), Allah turns to him with Mercy.
[6526]
Abu Musa reported: We were along with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) on a journey when the people began to pronounce Allah-o-Akbar in a loud voice. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: O people, sh mercy to yourselves for you are not calling One Who is deaf or absent. Verily, you are calling One Who is All-Hearing (and) Near to you and is with you. Abu Musa told that he had been behind him (the Holy Prophet) and reciting: "There is neither might nor power but that of Allah." He (the Holy Prophet), while addressing 'Abdullah b. Qais, said: Should I not direct you to a treasure from amongst the treasurers of Para- dise? I ('Abdullah b. Qais) said: Allah's Messenger, do it, of course. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Then recite: "There is no might and no power but that of Allah."
[6527]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Asim with the same chain of transmitters.
[6528]
Abu Musa reported that he (and his other companions) were climbing upon the hillock along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and when any person climbed up, he pronounced (loudly) : "There is no god but Allah, Allah is the Greatest." Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Verily, you are not supplicating One Who is deaf or absent. He said: Abu Musa or Abdullah b Qais, should I not direct you to the words (which form) the treasure of Paradise ? I said: Allah's Messenger, what are these? He said: "There is no might and no power but that of Allah."
[6529]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Musa with a slight variation of wording.
[6530]
Abu Musa reported: We were along with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) on a journey; the rest of the hadith is the same as transmitted by A'sim.
[6531]
Abu Musa, reported. We were along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in an expedition. The rest of the hadith is the same (and there is an addi- tion of these words in that) : "He (the Holy Prophet) said: He Whom you are sup- plicating is nearer to every one of you than the neck of his camel." And there is no mention of these words: "There is no might and no power but that of Allah."
[6532]
Abu Musa Ash'ari reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Should I not direct you to the words from the treasures of Paradise, or he said: Like a treasure from the treasures of Paradise ? I said: Of course, do that. Thereupon he said: "There is no might and no power but that of Allah."
[6533]
Abu Bakr reported that he said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him): Teach me a supplication which I should recite in my prayer. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Recite: "O Allah, I have done great wrong to myself." According to Qutaiba (the words were:) much (wrong)-there is none to forgive the sins but Thou only, say: "Grant me pardon from Thyself, have mercy upon me for Thou art much Forgiving and Compassionate." This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of 'Amr b. al-'As that Abu Bakr Siddiq said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him): Allah's Messenger. teach me a supplication which I should make in my prayer and in my house. The rest of the hadith is the same except with this variation that he said: Much wrong (Zulman Kathira).
[6534]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to make these supplications: "O Allah, I seek refuge in Thee from the trial of Hell-Fire; and from the torment of Hell-Fire; and from the trial of the grave and torment of the grave; and from the evil of the trial of the affluence and from the evil of the trial of poverty and I seek refuge in Thee from the evil of the turmoil of the Dajjal.O Allah, wash away my sins with snow and hail water, purify my heart from the sins as is purified the white garment from the dirt, and keep away at a distance the sins from me as yawns the distance between the East and the West; O Allah, I seek refuge in Thee from sloth, from senility, from sin, and from debt."
[6535]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[6536]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to say: "O Allah, I seek refuge in Thee from incapacity, from indolence, from cowardice, from senility, from miserliness, and I seek refuge in Thee from the torment of the grave and from trial of the life and death."
[6537]
Anas reported from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (this suppli- cation) but with this variation that these words are not found in that supplication: "From the trial of life and death."
[6538]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) used to seek refuge in Allah from such things as mentioned in the above-mentioned hadith and from 'miserliness" too.
[6539]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) wed to make this supplication: "O Allah, I seek refuge in Thee from miserliness, from sloth and from decrepitude."
[6540]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) used to seek refuge (in Allah) from the evil of destiny and from falling into the hand of calamity and from the mockery of (triumphant) enemies and from the hardship of misery. Abu Sufyan reported: I am in doubt that I have made an addition of one word in this supplication.
[6541]
Khaula bint Hakim Sulamiyya reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When anyone lands at a place, and then says: "I seek refuge in the Perfect Word of Allah from the evil of what He has created," nothing would harm him until he marches from that stopping place.
[6542]
Khaula bint Hakim Sulamiyya reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you stays at a place, he should say: "I seek refuge in the Perfect Word of Allah from the evil of that He created." Nothing would then do him any harm until he moves from that place. Abu Huraira reported that a person came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: "Allah's Messenger, I was stung by a scorpion during the night. Thereupon he said: Had you recited these words in the evening: "I seek refuge in the Perfect Word of Allah from the evil of what He created," it would not have done any harm to you.
[6543]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira with a slight variation of wording.
[6544]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported that Allah's, Messenger (may peace be upon said: When you go to bed, perform ablution as is done for prayer; then lie down pn the right side and recite: "O Allah, I turn my face towards Thee and entrust my affair to Thee. I retreat unto Thee for protection with hope in Thee and fear of Thee. There is no resort and no deliverer (from hardship) but Thou only. I affirm my faith in Thine books which Thou revealed and in Thine Apostles whom Thou sent." Make this as the last word of yours (when you go to sleep) and in case you die during that night, you would die upon Fitra (upon Islam). And as I repeated these words in order to commit them to memory, I said: "I affirm my faith in Thy Messenger (Rasul) whom Thou sent." He said: Say: "I affirm my faith in the Apostle (Nabi) whom Thou sent."
[6545]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of al-Bara' b. 'Azib with a slight variation of wording and there is this addition in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Husain: "In case you get up in the morning, you will get up with bliss."
[6546]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported that Allah's Messenger (in may peace be upon him) commanded a person (in these words): When you go to bed during night, you should say: "O Allah, I surrender myself to Thee and entrust my affair to Thee, with hope in Thee and fear of Thee. There is no resort and no deliverer (from hardship but Thou). I affirm my faith in the Book which Thou revealed and in the Messengers whom Thou sent." If you die in this state you would die on Fitra, and Ibn Bashshdr did not make a mention of "night" in this hadith.
[6547]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of al-Bara' b. 'Azib that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to a person: O, so and so, as you go to your bed; the rest of the hadith is the same but with this variation of wording that he said: "Thine Apostle whom Thou sent." If you die that night you would die on Fitra and if you get up in the morning you would get up with a bliss.
[6548]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of al-Bara' b. 'Azib that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded a person (in these words) and there is no mention of this: "if you get up in the morning you would get up with a bliss."
[6549]
Al-Bara' reported that whenever Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went to bed, he said: "O Allah, it is with Thine Name that I live and it is with Thine Name that I die." And when he got up he used to say: "Praise is due to Allah, Who gave us life after our death (sleep) and unto Thee is resurrection."
[6550]
Abdullah b. 'Umar commanded a person that as he went to bed, he should say: "O Allah, Thou created my being and it is for Thee to take it to its ultimate goal. And its death and life is due to Thee, and if Thou givest it life, safeguard it; and if Thou bringst death, grant it pardon. O Allah, I beg of Thee safety." A person said to him: Did you hear it from Umar? Thereupon he said: (I have heard from one) who is better than Umar, viz. from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). Ibn Nafi, reported this on the authority of Abdullah b. Harith but he did not make mention of this "that he heard it himself".
[6551]
Suhail reported that Abu Salih used to command us (in these words): When any one of you intends to go to sleep, he should lie on the bed on his right side and then say: "O Allah. the Lord of the Heavens and the Lord of the Earth and Lord of the Magnificent Throne, our Lord, and the Lord of evervthina, the Splitter of the grain of corn and the datestone (or fruit kernal), the Revealer of Torah and Injil (Bible) and Criterion (the Holy Qur'an), I seek refuge in Thee from the evil of every- thing Thou art to sieze by the forelock (Thou hast perfect control over it). O Allah, Thou art the First, there is naught before Thee, and Thou art the Last and there is naught after Thee, and Thou art Evident and there is nothing above Thee, and Thou art Innermost and there is nothing beyond Thee. Remove the burden of debt from us and relieve us from want." Abu Salih used to narrate it from Abu Huraira who narrated it from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[6552]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to command us that as we go to our bedo, we should utter the words (as mention- ed above) and he also said (these words): "From the evil of every animal, Thou hast hold upon its forelock (Thou bast full control over it)."
[6553]
Abu Huraira reported that Fatima (the daughter of the Holy Prophet) came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and asked for a servant. He said to her: Say: "O Allah, the Lord of the seven heavens" ; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[6554]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as say- ing: When any one of you goes to bed, he should take hold of the hem of his lower garment and then should clean (his bed) with the help of that and then should recite the name of Allah for he himself does tiot know what he left behind him on his bed, and when he intends to lie on bed, he should lie on his right side and utter these words: "Hallowed be Allah, my Lord. It is with Thine (grace) that I place my side (upon the bed) and it is with Thee that I take it up (after sleep), and in case Thou withholdst my being (if thou causest me to die), then grant pardon to my being, and if Thou keepst (this process of breathing on), then protect it with that with which Thou protected Thine pious servants."
[6555]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ubaidullah b. Umar with the same chain of transmitters and he said: Then utter: "My Lord. with Thine name I place my side and if Thou keepest me alive have mercy upon myself"
[6556]
Anas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When you go to bed, say: "Praise is due to Allab Who fed us, provided us drink, sufficed us and provided us with shelter, for many a people there is none to suffice and none to provide shelter."
[6557]
Farwa' b. Naufal Ashja'i reported: I asked: 'A'isha, in what words did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) supplicate Allah? She said that he used to utter: "I seek refuge in Thee from the evil of what I did and from the evil of what I did not."
[6558]
Farwa' b. Naufal reported: I asked 'A'isha about the supplication that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) made. She said that he used to say: "O Allah, I seek refuge in Thee from the evil of what I have done and from the evil of what I have not done."
[6559]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Muhammad b. ja'far through another chain of transmitters.
[6560]
Farwa' b. Naufal reported on the authority of 'A'isha that Allah's Mes- senger (may peace be upon him) used to supplicate (in these words): "O Allah, I seek refuge in Thee from the evil of what I did and from the evil of what I did not."
[6561]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to say: "O Allah, it is unto Thee that I surrender myself. I affirm my faith in Thee and repose my trust in Thee and turn to Thee in repentance and with Thy help fought my adversaries. O Allah, I seek refuge in Thee with Thine Power; there is no god but Thou, lest Thou leadest me astray. Thou art ever-living that dieth not, while the Jinn and mankind die."
[6562]
Abu Huraira reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) set out on a journey in the morning, he used to say: " A listener listened to our praising Allah (for) His goodly trial of us. Our Lord ! acompany us, guard us and bestow upon us Thy grace. I am seeker of refuge in Allah from the Fire."
[6563]
Abu Musa Ash'ari reported on the authority of his father that Allahs Apostle (may peace be upon him) used to supplicate in these words: "O Allah, forgive me my faults, my ignorance, my immoderation in my concerns. And Thou art better aware (of my affairs) than myself. O Allah, grant me forgiveness (of the faults which I committed) seriously or otherwise (and which I committed inadvertently and de- liberately. All these (failings) are in me. O Allah, grant me forgiveness from the fault which I did in haste or deferred, which I committed in privacy or in public and Thou art better aware of (them) than myself. Thou art the First and the Last and over all things Thou art Omnipotent."
[6564]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[6565]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to supplicate (in these words) :"O Allah, set right for me my religion which is the safeguard of my affairs. And set right for me the affairs of my world wherein is my living. And set right for me my Hereafter on which depends my after-life. And make the life for me (a source) of abundance for every good and make my death a source of comfort for me protecting me against every evil."
[6566]
Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to supplicate (in these words) : "O Allah. I beg of Thee the right guidance, safeguard against evils, chastity and freedom from want."
[6567]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Ishaq with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[6568]
Zaid b. Alqam reported: I am not going to say anything but only that which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upgn him) used to say. He used to supplicate: "O Allah, I seek refuge in Thee from incapacity, from sloth, from cowardice, from miserliness, decrepitude and from torment of the grave. O Allah, grant to my soul the sense of righteousness and purify it, for Thou art the Best Purifier thereof. Thou art the Protecting Friend thereof, and Guardian thereof. O Allah, I seek refuge in Thee from the knowledge which does not benefit, from the heart that does not entertain the fear (of Allah), from the soul that does not feel contented and the supplication that is not responded."
[6569]
Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported that when it was evening Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to supplicate: "We entered upon evening and the whole Kingdom of Allah also entered upon evening and praise is due to Allah. There is no god but Allah, the One Who has no partner with Him." Hasan said that Zubaid reported to him that he memorised it from Ibrahim in these very words. "His is the Sovereignty and Praise is due to Him, and He is Potent over everything. O Allah, I beg of Thee the good of this night and I seek refuge in Thee from the evil of this night and the evil which follows it. O Allah, I seek refuge in Thee from sloth, from the evil of vanity. O Allah, I seek refuge in Thee from torment in the Hell-Fire and from torment in the grave."
[6570]
Abdullah reported that when it was evening Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to supplicate: "We have entered upon evening and so, too, the whole Kingdom of Allah has entered upon evening. Praise is due to Allah. There is no god but Allah, the One having no partner with Him." He (the narrator) said : I think that he also uttered (in this supplication these words) :"His is tne Sovercignty and to Him is praise due and He is Potent over everything. My Lord, I beg of Thee good that lies in this night and good that follows it and I seek refuge in Thee from the evil that lies in this night and from the evil of that which follows it. My Lord, I seek refuge in Thee from sloth, from the evil of vanity. My Lord, I seek refuge in Thee from torment of the Hell-Fire and from torment of the grave." And when it was morning he said like this:"We entered upon morning and the whole Kingdom of Allah enter ed upon morning."
[6571]
Abdullah reported that when it was evening Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to supplicate: "We have entered upon evening and so has the Kingdom of Allah entere d upon evening ; praise is due to Allah, there is no god but Allah the One, and there is no partner with Him. O Allah, I beg of Thee the blessing of this night and the blessing of that which lies in it. I seek refuge in Thee from the evil of it and what lies in it. O Allah, I seek refuge in Thee from sloth, from decrepitude, from the evil of vanity, from trial of the world, and from torment of the grave." Zubaid, through another chain of transmitters, has narrated on the authority of Abdullah directly this addition : "There is no god but Allah, the One, there is no partner with Him, His is the Sovereignty and to Him is praise due and He is Potent over everything."
[6572]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira that Allah's Messenge; (may peace be upon him) used to supplicate thus: "There is no god but Allah, the One Who conferred upon His armies the honour of victory and helped His servant rout the clans; there is nothing after that."
[6573]
'Ali reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Say, "O Allah, direct me to the right path and make me adhere to the straight path," and when you make a mention of right guidance, keep in mind the right path and when you consider of the straight (path), keep in mind the straightness of the arrow.
[6574]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Asim b. Kulaib with the same chain of transmitters that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to me: Say: "O Allah, I beg of Thee righteousness and adhering to the straight path."
[6575]
Juwairiya reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came out from (her apartment) in the morning as she was busy in observing her dawn prayer in her place of worship. He came back in the forenoon and she was still sitting there. He (the Holy Prophet) said to her: You have been in the same seat since I left you. She said: Yes. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: I recited four words three times after I left you and if these are to be weighed against what you have recited since morning these would outweigh them and (these words) are: "Hallowed be Allah and praise is due to Him according to the number of His creation and according to the pleasure of His Self and according to the weight of His Throne and according to the ink (used in recording) words (for His Praise)."
[6576]
Juwairiya reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by her as she was observing her dawn prayer; or after she had observed her dawn prayer. The rest of the hadith is the same but with this variation that he said: "Hallowed be Allah according to the number of His creation, hallowed be Allah according to the pleasure of His Self, hallowed be Allah according to the weight of His Throne, hallowed be Allah according to the ink used in recording His words."
[6577]
It is reported on the authority of Ali that Fatima had corns in her hand because of working at the hand-mill. There had fallen to the lot of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) some prisoners of war. She (Fatima) came to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) but she did not find him (in the house). She met A'isha and informed her (about her hardship). When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came, she ( A'isha) informed him about the visit of Fatima. ABah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to them (Fitima and her family). They had gone to their beds. 'Ali further (reported) : We tried to stand up (as a mark of respect) but Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Keep to your beds, and he sat amongst us and I felt coldness of his feet upon my chest. He then said: May I not direct you to something better than what you have asked for ? When you go to your bed, you should recite Takbir (Allah-o-Akbar) thirty-four times and Tasbih (Subhdn Allah) thirty-three times and Tahmid (al-Hamdu li-Allah) thirty-three times, and that is better than the servant for you.
[6578]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters but. with a slight variation of wording.
[6579]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn Abi Laili but with this addition : "Ali said: Ever since I heard this (supplication) from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), I never abandoned it. It was said to him, Not even in the night of Siffin (battle of Siffin) ? He sad: Yes, not even in the night of Siffin,"
[6580]
Abu Huraira reported that Fatima came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and asked for a servant and told him of the hardship of household work. He said: You would not be able to get a servant from us. May I not direct you to what is better than the servant for you ? Recite Subhaana Allah thirty-three times, al- Hamdu li-Allah thirty-three times and Allah-o-Akbar thirty-four times as you go to bed. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Suhail with the same chain of transmitters.
[6581]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as say- ing. When you listen to the crowing of the cock, ask Allah for His favour as it sees Angels and when you listen to the braying of the donkey, seek refuge in Allah from the Satan for it sees Satan.
[6582]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) used to supplicate during the time of trouble (in these words): "There is no god but Allah, the Great, the Tolerant, there is no god but Allah, the Lord of the Magnificent Throne There is no god but Allah, the Lord of the Heaven and the earth, the Lord of the Edifying Throne."
[6583]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[6584]
Ibn Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to supplicate (with these words) and he (uttered these words) at the time of trouble; the rest of the hadith is the same except with this difference that insted of saying: "The Lord of heaven and the earth," he said: "The Lord of the heaven and that of the earth."
[6585]
Ibn 'Abbas reported this hadith through another chain of transmitters with a sliglit variation of wording.
[6586]
Abu Dharr reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was asked as to which words were the best. He said: Those for which Allah made a choice for His Angels and His servants (and the words are): "Hallowed be Allah and praise is due to Him."
[6587]
Abu Dharr reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Should I not inform you about the words liked most by Allah? I said: Allah's Mes- senger, do inform me about the words liked most by Allah. He said: Verily, the words liked most by Allah are: "hallowed be Allah and praise is due to Him."
[6588]
Abu Dharr reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: There is no believing servant who supplicates for his brother behind his back (in his absence) that the Angels do not say: The same be for you too.
[6589]
Umm Darda' reported: My husband reported that he heard Allah's Mes- senger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who supplicates for his brother behind his back (in his absence), the Angel commissioned (for carrying supplication to his Lord) says: Amen, and it is for you also.
[6590]
Safwan (and he was Ibn 'Abdullah b. Safwan, and he had been married to Umm Darda') reported : I visited Abu Darda's house in Syria. I did not find him there but Umm Darda' (was present at the house). She said: Do you intend to perform Hajj during this year? I said: Yes. She said: Do supplicate Allah for blessings upon us, for Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon hiin) used to say: The supplication of a Muslim for his brother at his back (in his absence) is responded so long as he makes a supplica- tion for blessings for his brother and the commissioned Angel says: Amen, and says: May it be for you too I I went to the bazar and met Abfi Dardi' and he narrated like this from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[6591]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Safwan b. 'Abdullah b. Safwan with the same chain of transmitters.
[6592]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Allah is pleased with His servant who says: Al-Hamdu lillah While taking a morsel of food tnd while drinking.
[6593]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The supplication of every one of you is granted if he does not grow impatient and says: I supplicated but it was not granted.
[6594]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The supplication of one of you is granted if he does not grow impatient and say- I supplicated my Lord but it was not granted.
[6595]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The supplication of the servant is granted in case he does not supplicate for sin or for severing the ties of blood, or he does not become impatient. It was said: Allah's Messenger, what does: "If he does not grow impatient" imply? He said: That he should say like this: I supplicated and I supplicated but I did not find it being responded. and theu he becomes frustrated and abandons supplication.
[6596]
Usama b. Zaid reported that Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) said: I stood at the door of Paradise and I found that the overwhelming majority of those who entered therein was that of poor persons and the wealthy persons were detained to get into that. The denizens of Hell were commanded to get into Hell, and I stood upon the door of Fire and the majority amongst them who entered there was that of women.
[6597]
Ibn Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I had a chance to look into the Paradise and I found that majority of the people was poor and I looked into the Fire and there I found the majority constituted by women.
[6598]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas through another chain of transmitters.
[6599]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stated like this: Re looked into the Fire of Hell. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6600]
Imran b. Husain reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Amongst the inmates of Paradise the women would form a minority.
[6601]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Mutarrif through another chain of transmitters.
[6602]
'Abdullah b. Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) supplicated in these words: "O Allah, I seek refuge in Thee from the withdrawal of Thine blessing and the change of Thine protection (from me) and from the sudden wrath of Thine, and from every displeasure of Thine."
[6603]
Usama b. Zaid reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I have not left after me any (chance) of turmoil more injurious to men than the harm done to the men because of women.
[6604]
Usama b. Zaid b. Harith and Sa'id b. Zaid b. 'Amr b. Naufal both reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I have not left after me turmoil for the people but the harm done to men by women.
[6605]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sulaiman Taimi with the same chain of transmitters.
[6606]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The world is sweet and green (alluring) and verily Allah is going to install you as vicegerent in it in order to see how you act. So avoid the allurement of women: verily, the first trial for the people of Isri'll was caused by women. And in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Ibn Bashshar the words are : "So that He should see how you act."
[6607]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Three persons set out on a journey. They were overtaken by rain and they had to find protection in a mountain cave where at its mouth there fell a rock of that mountain and thus blocked them altogether. One of them said to the others: Look to your good deeds that you performed for the sake of Allah and then supplicate Allah, the Exalted, that He might rescue you (from this trouble). One of them said: 0 Allah, I had my parents who were old and my wife and my small children also. I tended the flock and when I came back to them in the evening, I milked them (the sheep, goats, cows, etc.) and first served that milk to my parents. One day I was obliged to go out to a distant place in search of fodder and I could not come back before evening and found them (the parents) asleep. I milked the animals as I used to milk and brought milk to them and stood by their heads avoiding to disturb them from sleep and I did not deem it advisable to serve milk to my children before serving them. My children wept near my feet. I remained there in that very state and my parents too until it was morning. And (0 Allah) if Thou art aware that I did this in order to seek Thine pleasure, grant us riddance from this trouble. (The rock slipped a bit) that they could see the sky. The second one said: 0 Allah, I had a female cousin whom I loved more than the men love the women. I wanted to have sexual intercourse with her; she refused but on the condition of getting one hundred dinirs. It was with very great difficulty that I could collect one hundred dinirs and then paid them to her and when I was going to have a sexual intercourse with her, that she said: Servant of Allah, fear Allah and do not break the seal (of chastity) but by lawful means. I got up. 0 Allah, if Thou art aware that I did this in order to seek Thine pleasure, rid us from this trouble. The situation was somewhat eased for them. The third one said : Allah, I employed a workman for a measure of rice. After he had finished his work I gave him his dues (in the form of) a measure of rice, but he did not accept them. I used these rice as seeds ,and that gave a bumper crop and I became rich enough to have cows and flocks (in my possession). He came to me and said: Fear Allah, and commit no crueltv upon me in regard to my dues. I said to him : Takeaway this flock of cows and sheep. He said: Fear Allah and do not make a fun of me. I said: I am not making a fun of you. You take the cows and the flocks. So he took them. 0 Allah, if Thou art aware that I did it for Thine pleasure, case the situation for us. And Allah relieved them from the rest of the trouble.
[6608]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Musa b. 'Uqba but with a slight variation of wording.
[6609]
Abdullah b 'Umar reported: I heard Allah's Alessenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Three persons belonging to the earlier Ummahs set out on a journey until they had to spend a night in a cave. The rest of the hadith is the same and the additional words are: "A person amongst them said: 0 Allah, I had my aged parents and I served them milk before I (served that) to my wife, children and my servants." And in case of the second one, the words are: "She avoided me until she was hard pressed because of famine and she came to me and I gave her one hundred and twenty diiiirs " And in cease of the third one (the words are) : "I invested his wages, and it brought profit and, as a result thereof, the merchandise increased and there was abundance of goods." And he (the narrator said) that they got out of the cave and began to walk.
[6610]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said: I live in the thought of My servant and I am with him as he remembers Me. (The Holy Prophet) further said: By Allah, Allah is more pleased wth the repentance of His servant than what one of you would do on finding the lost camel in the waterless desert. When he draws near Me by the span of his hand. I draw near him by the length of a cubit and when he draws near Me by the length of a cubit. I draw near him by the length of a fathom and when he draws near Me walking I draw close to him hurriedly.
[6611]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah is more pleased with the repentance of His servant when he turns penitently towards Him than one of you would be on finding the lost camel.
[6612]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters.
[6613]
Harith b. Suwaid said: I went to see 'Abdullah to inquire about his health as he was sick and he narrated to us a hadith of Allahs Messenger (may peace be upon him). He heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah is more pleased with the repentance of His believing servant than a person who loses his riding beast carrying food and drink. He sleeps (being disappointed of its recovery) and then gets up and goes in search for that, until he is stricken with thirst. then comes back to the place where he had been before and goes to sleep completely exhausted placing his head upon his hands waiting for death. And when he gets up, lot there is before him his riding beast and his provisions of food and drink. Allah is more pleased with the repentance of His servant than the recovery of this riding beast along with the provisions (of food and drink).
[6614]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash through another chain of transmitters.
[6615]
'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah is more pleased with the repentance of a believing man. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6616]
Nu'man b. Bashir reported: Allah is more pleased with the repentance of a believing servant than of a person who set out on a journey with a provision of food and drink on the back of his camel. He went on until he came to a waterless desert and he felt like sleeping. So he got down under the shade of a tree and was overcome by sleep and his camel ran away. As he got up he tried to see (the camel) standing upon a mound. but did not find it. He then got upon the other mound, but could not see anything. He then climbed upon the third mound but did not see anything until he came back to the place where he had been previously. And as he was sitting (in utter disappointment) there came to him the camel, till that (camel) placed its nosestring in his hand. Allah is more pleased with the repentance of His servant than the person who found (his lost camel) in this very state. Simak reported that Sha'bi was of the opinion that Nu'min traced it to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). Simak, however, did not hear that himself.
[6617]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: What is your opinion about the delight of a person whose camel loaded with the provisions of food and drink is lost and that moves about with its nosestring trailing upon the waterless desert in which there is neither food nor drink, and lie wanders about in search of that until he is completely exhausted and then accidentally it happens to pass by the trunk of a tree and its nosestring gets entangled in that and he finds it entangled therein? He (in response to the question of the Holy Prophet) said: Allah's Messenger, he would feel highly delighted. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said. By Allah, Allah is more delighted at the repentance of His servant than that person (as he finds his lost) camel.
[6618]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Allah is more pleased with the repentance of a servant as he turns towards Him for repentance than this that one amongst you is upon the camel in a waterless desert and there is upon (that camel) his provision of food and drink also and it is lost by him, and he having lost all hope (to get tbat) lies down in the shadow and is disappointed about his camel and there he finds that camel standing before him. He takes hold of his nosestring and then out of boundless joy says: 0 Lord, Thou art my servant and I am Thine Lord. He commits this mistake out of extreme delight.
[6619]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Allah is more pleased with the repentance of His servant than if one of you gets up and he finds his camel missing in a waterless desert (and then he accidentally finds it). This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik through another chain of transmitters.
[6620]
Abu Sirma reported that when the time of the death of Abu Ayyub Ansari drew near, he said: I used to conceal from you a thing which I heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as sayirig: Had you not committed sins, Allah would have brought into existence a creation that would have committed sin (and Allah) would have forgiven them.
[6621]
Abu Ayyub Ansari reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: If you were not to commit sins, Allah would have swept you out of existence and would have replaced you by another people who have committed sin, and then asked forgiveness from Allah, and He would have granted them pardon.
[6622]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: By Him in Whose Hand is my life, if you were not to commit sin, Allah would sweep you out of existence and He would replace (you by) those people who would commit sin and seek forgiveness from Allah, and He would have pardoned them.
[6623]
Hanzala Usayyidi, who was amongst the scribes of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). reported: I met Abu Bakr. He said: Who are you? He (Hanzala) said: Hanzala has turned to be a hypocrite. He (Abu Bakr) said: Hallowed be Allah, what are you saying? Thereupon he said: I say that when we are in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) we ponder over Hell-Fire and Paradise as if we are seeing them with our very eyes and when we are away from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) we attend to our wives, our children, our business; most of these things (pertaining to After-life) slip out of our minds. Abu Bakr said: By Allah, I also experience the same. So I and Abu Bakr went to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said to him : Allah's Messenger, Hanzala has turned to be a hypocrite. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: What has happened to you? I said: Allah's Messenger, when we are in your company, we are reminded of Hell-Fire and Paradise as if we are seeing them with our own eyes, but whenever we go away from you and attend to our wives, children and business, much of these things go out of our minds. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: By Him in Whose Hand is my life, if your state of mind remains the same as it is in my presence and you are always busy in remembrance (of Allah), the Angels will shake hands with you in your beds and in your paths but, Hanzala, time should be devoted (to the worldly affairs) and time (should be devoted to prayer and meditation). He (the Holy Prophet) said this thrice.
[6624]
Hanzala reported: We were in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he delivered to us a sermon and made a mention of Hell-Fire. Then I came to my house and began to laugh with my children and sport with my wife. (Hanzala) further reported: I went out and met Abu Bakr and made a mention of that to him. Thereupon he said: I have done the same as you have mentioned. So we went to see Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) and said to him: Allah's Messenger, Hanzala has turned to he a hypocrite. And he (the Holy Prophet) said Show respite. And then I narrated to him the story, and Abu Bakr said: I have done the same as he has done. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Hanzala, there is a time for worldly affairs and a time for (worship and devotion), and if your state of mind is always the same as it is at the time of remembrance of Allah, the Angels would shake hands with you and would greet you on the path by saying: As-Salamu-Alaikum.
[6625]
Hanzala Taimi Ufayyidi, the scribe of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), reported: We were in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he brought to our minds the problems pertaining to Paradise and Hell-Fire. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6626]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: When Allah created the creation as He was upon the Throne, He put down in His Book: Verily, My mercy predominates My wrath.
[6627]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said: My mercy excels My wrath.
[6628]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : When Allah created the creation, He ordained for Himself and this document is with Him: Verily, My mercy predominates Mv wrath.
[6629]
Abu Huraira reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah created mercy in one hundred parts and He retained with Him ninety-nine parts, and He has sent down upon the earth one part, and it is because of this one part that there is mutual love among the creation so much so that the animal lifts up its hoof from its younc, one, fearing that it might harm it.
[6630]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah created one hundred (parts of mercy) and He distributed one amongst His creation and kept this one hundred excepting one with Himself (for the Day of Resurrection).
[6631]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : There are one hundred (parts of) mercy for Allah and He has sent down out of these one part of mercy upon the jinn and human beings and the insects and it is because of this (one part) that they love one another, show kindness to one another and even the beast treats its young one with affection, and Allah has reserved ninetynine parts of mercy with which He would treat His servants on the Day of Resurrection.
[6632]
Salman Farisi reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Verily, there are one hundred (parts of) mercy for Allah, and it is one part of this mercy by virtue of which there is mutual love between the people and ninety-nine reserved for the Day of Resurrection.
[6633]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Mu'tamir, reported on the authority of his father.
[6634]
Salman reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Verily, Allah created, on the same very day when He created the heavens and the earth, one hundred parts of mercy. Every part of mercy is coextensive with the space between the heavens. and the earth and He out of this mercy endowed one part to the earth and it is because of this that the mother shows affection to her child and even the beasts and birds show kindness to one another and when there would be the Day of Resurrection, Allah would make full (use of Mercy).
[6635]
'Umar b. Khattab reported that there were brought some prisoners to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) amongst whom there was also a woman, who was searching (for someone) and when she found a child amongst the prisoners, she took hold of it, pressed it against her chest and provided it suck. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Do you think this woman would ever afford to throw her child in the Fire ? We said: By Allah, so far as it lies in her power, she would never throw the child in Fire.' Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Allah is more kind to His servants than this woman is to her child.
[6636]
'Ala' reported on the authority of his father who reported on the authority of Abu Huraira that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: If a believer were to know the punishment (in Hell) none would have the audacity to aspire for Paradise (but he would earnestly desire to be rescued from Hell), and if a non-believer were to know what is there with Allah as a mercy. none would have been disappointed in regard to Paradise.
[6637]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that a person who had never done any good deed asked the members of his family to burn his dead body when he would die and to scatter half of its ashes over the land and half in the ocean. By Allah, if Allah finds him in His grip, He would torment him with a torment with which He did not afflict anyone amongst the people of the world; and when the person died, it was done to him as he had commanded (his family) to do. Allah commanded the land to collect (the ashes scattered on it) and He commanded the ocean and that collected (ashes) contained in it. Allah questioned him why he had done. that He said: My Lord, it is out of Thine fear that I have done it and Thou art well aware of it, and Allah granted him pardon:.
[6638]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that a person committed sin beyond measure and when he was going to die, he left this will: (When I die), bum my dead body and then cast them (the ashes) to the wind and in the ocean. By Allah, if my Lord takes hold of me, He would torment me as He has not tormented anyone else. They did as he had asked them to do. He (the Lord) said to the earth: Return what you have taken. And he was thus restored to his (original form). He (Allah) said to him: What prompted you to do this? He said: My Lord, it was Thine fear or Thine awe, and Allah pardoned him because of this. Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that a woman was thrown into Hell-Fire because of a cat whom she had tied and did not provide it with food. nor did she set it free to cat insects of the euth until it died inch by inch. Zuhri said: (These two ahidith) show that a person rhould neither feel confident (of getting into Paradise) because of his deeds, nor should he lose (all hopes) of getting into Paradise.
[6639]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that a servant transgressed the litnit in committing sins. The rest of the hadith is the same but there is no mention of the story of the cat in it and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Ziibaidl (the words are): "Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said to everything which had taken a part of lies ashes to return what it had taken."
[6640]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said that a person amongst the earlier nations before you was conferred property and children by Allah, He said to his children: 'You must do as I command you to do, otherwise I will make others besides you as my inheritors. As I die, burn my body and blow my ashes in the wind as I do not find any merit of mine which would please Allah, and if Allah were to take hold of me, He would punish me. He took a pledge from them and they did as he commanded thein to do. Allah said: What prompted you to do this? He said: My Lord. Thine fear, and Allah did not punish him at all.
[6641]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording and Qatada explained the word "lam yasiru" as: "I find no good in store for rxie in the eye of Allah."
[6642]
Abu Huraira reported from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that his Lord, the Exalted and Glorious, thus said. A servant committed a sin and he said : O Allah,forgive me my sins, and Allah (the Exalted and Glorious)said :My servant commited a sin and then he came to realise that he has a Lord Who forgives the sins and takes to account (the sinner) for the sin. He then again committed a sin and said: My Lord, forgive me my sin, and Allah, the Exalted and High, said: My servant committed a sin and then came to realise that he has a Lord Who would forgive his sin or would take (him) to account for the sin. He again committed a sin and said: My Lord, forgive me for my sin, and Allah (the Exalted and High) said: My servant sas committed a sin and then came to realise that he has a Lord Who forgives the sins or takes (him) to account for sin. 0 servant, do what you like. I have granted you forgiveness.
'Abd al-A'la said: I do not know whether he said thrice or four times to do "what you desire". The hadlth has been narrated on the authority of 'Abd al-A'la b. Hammad with the same chain of transmitters.
[6643]
Abu Huraira reported lie heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that a servant committed a sin. The rest of the hadith is the same, but there is a slight variation of wording.
[6644]
Abu Mu'sa reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, Stretches out His Hand during the night so that the people repent for the fault committed from dawn till dusk and He stretches out His Hand daring the day so that the people may reprint for the fault committed from dusk to dawn. (He would accept repentance) before the sun rises in the west (before the Day of Resurrection). A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[6645]
'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Nothing is more loveable to Allah than His praise as He has praised Himself and no one is more self-respecting than Allah Himself and it As because of this that He has prohibited abominable acts.
[6646]
'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None is more self-respectidg than Allah and it is because of this that He has prohibited abominable acts-both visible and invisible-and none loves His praise more than Allah Himself.
[6647]
'Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported it directly from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that he said: None is more self-respecting than Allah and it is because of this that He has prohibited abominable acts-both visible and invisible and nothing is loved by Allah more than the praise of His Ownself and it is because of this that He has praised Himself.
[6648]
Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : None loves one's own praise more than Allah, the Exalted and Glurious, does. It is because of this that He has praised Himself, and none is more self-respecting than Allah and it is because of this that He has prohibited abominable acts and there is none who is more anxious to accept the apologies of the people than Allah Himself and it is because of this that He has revealed the Book and sent the Messengers.
[6649]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : Allah is self-respecting and a believer is also self-respecting and the respect of Allah is injured if a believer does what He has forbidden him to do.
[6650]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Asma' daughter of Abu Bakr, through another chain of transmitters.
[6651]
Abu Salama reported from Abu Huraira that he narrated that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon hin) said: There is none more self-respecting than Allah, the Exalted and Glorious There is no mention of the narration of Asma'.
[6652]
Asma' reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said : There is none more self-respecting than Allah, the Exalted and Glorious.
[6653]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him )as saying: A believer is self-respecting and Allah is extremely self-respecting.
[6654]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba through another chain of transmitters.
[6655]
'Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported that a person kissed a woman and he came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and made a mention of that to him. It was (on this occasion) that this verse was revealed: "And observe prayer at the (two) ends of the day and in the first hours of the night. Surely, good deeds take away evil deeds. That is a reminder for the mindful" (xi. 115). That person said: Allah's Messenger, does it concern me only ? He (the Holy Prophet) said: It concerns every one of my Unimah, who acts according to it.
[6656]
Ibn Mas'ud reported that a person came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and told him that he had kissed a woman or touched her with his hand or did something like this. He inquired of him about its expiation. It was (on this occasion) that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, revealed this verse (as mentioned above).
[6657]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sulaiman Taimi with the same chain of transmitters that a person had taken liberty with a woman less than fomication. He came to 'Umar b. Khattab and he took it to be a serious offence. Then he came to Abu Bakr and he also took it to be a serious offence. Then he came the Allahs Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he made a mention of this to him. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6658]
'Abdullah reported that a person came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, I sported with a woman in the outskirts of Medina, and I have committed an offence short of fornication. Here I am (before you), kindly deliver verdict about me which you deem fit. Unar said : Allah concealed your fault. You had better conceal it yourself also. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), however, gave no reply to him. The man stood up and went away and Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) sent a person after him to call him and be recited this verse: "And observe prayer at the ends of the day and in the first hours of the night. Surely, good deeds take away evil deeds. That is a reminder for the mindful" (xi. l15). A person amongst the people said: Allah's Apostle, does it concern this marn only? Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: No, but the people at large.
[6659]
This hadith has been transmitted by Abu al-Ahwas and in this (these words are) also found: Mu'adh said: Allah's Messenger, does it concern this particular case or to all of us? And he (the Holy Prophet) said: Of course, to all of you.
[6660]
Anas reported that a person came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Allah's Messenger, I have committed an offence which deserves imposition of haad, so impose it upon me according to the Book of Allah. Thereupon he said: Were you not present with us at the time of prayer? He said: Yes.Thereupon he said: You have been granted pardon.
[6661]
Abu Umama reported: We were sitting in the mosque in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). A person came there and said: Allah's Messenger, I have committed an offence which deserves the imposition of hadd upon me, so impose it upon me. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) kept silent. He repeated it and said: Allah's Messenger, I have committed an offence which deserves the imposition of hadd upon me, so impose it upon me. He (the Holy Prophet) kept silent, and it was at this time that Iqama was pronounced for prayer (and the prayer was observed). And when Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had concluded the payer that person followed Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). Abu Umama said: I too followed Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) after he had concluded the prayer, so that I should know what answer he would give to that person. That person remained attached to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, I have committed an offence which deserves imposition of hadd upon me, so impose it upon me. Abu Umama reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Didn't you see that as you got out of the house, you performed ablution perfectly well. He said: Allah's Messenger, of course. I did it. He again said to him: Then you observed prayer along with us. He said: Allah's Messenger, yes, it is so. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Verily, Allah has exempted you from the imposition of hadd, or he said. From your sin.
[6662]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There was a person before you who had killed ninety-nine persons and then made an inquiry about the learned persons of the world (who could show him the way to salvation). He was directed to a monk. He came to him and told him that he had killed ninety-nine persons and asked him whether there was any scope for his repentance to be accepted. He said: No. He killed him also and thus completed one hundred. He then asked about the learned persons of the earth and he was directed to a scholar, and he told him that he had killed one hundred persons and asked him whether there was any scope for his repentance to be accepted. He said: Yes; what stands between you and the repentance? You better go to such and such land; there are people devoted to prayer and worship and you also worship along with them and do not come to the land of yours since it was an evil land (for you). So he went away and he had hardly covered half the distance when death came to him and there was a dispute between the angels of mercy and the angels of punishment. The angels of mercy said: This man has come as a penitant and remorseful to Allah and the angels of punishment said: He has done no good at all. Then there came another angel in the form of a human being in order to decide between them. He said: You measure the land to which he has drawn near. They measured it and found him nearer to the land where he intended to go (the land of piety), and so the angels of mercy took possession of it. Qatada said that Hasan told him that it was said to them that as death approached him, he crawled upon his chest (and managed) to slip in the land of mercy.
[6663]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that a man killed ninety-nine persons and then he began to make an inquiry whether there was any way left for him for repentance. He came to a monk and asked him about that, and he said: There is no chance for repentance for you. He killed the monk also and then began to make an inquiry and moved from one village to another village where there lived pious persons, and as he had covered some distance, he was overtaken by death, but he managed to crawl upon his chest (to the side nearer to the place where the pious men lived). He died and then there was a dispute between the angels of mercy and the angels of punishment and (when it was measured) he was found to be nearer to the village where pious persons were living equal to the Space of a span and he was thus included among them.
[6664]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Qatida with the same chain of transmitters but (with this variation of wording): "Allah commanded the earth (from where) he wanted to come out to move itself away and to the other earth (where he wanted to go) to draw nearer."
[6665]
Abu Musa' reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: When it will be the Day of Resurrection Allah would deliver to every Muslim a Jew or a Christian and say: That is your rescue from Hell-Fire.
[6666]
Abu Burda reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: No Muslim would die but Allah would admit in his stead a Jew or a Christian in Hell-Fire. 'Umar b. Abd al-'Aziz took an oath: By One besides Whom there is no god but He, thrice that his father had narrated that to him from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[6667]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of 'Aun b. Utba.
[6668]
Abu Burda reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would come people amongst the Muslims on the Day of Resurrection with as heavy sins as a mountain, and Allah would forgive them and He would place in their stead the Jews and the Christians. (As far as I think), Abu Raub said: I do not know as to who is in doubt. Abu Burda said: I narrated it to 'Umar b. 'Abd al-'Aziz, whereupon he said : Was it your father who narrated it to you from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) ? I said: Yes.
[6669]
Safwan b. Muhriz reported that a person said to Ibn 'Umar: How did you hear Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying something about intimate conversation ? He said: I heard him say: A believer will be brought to his Lord, the Exalted and Glorious, on the Day of Resurrection and He would place upon him His veil (of Light) and make him confess his faults and say: Do you recognise (your faults) ? He would say: My Lord, I do recognise (them). He (the Lord) would say: I concealed them for you in the world. And today I forgive them. And he would then be given the Book containing (the account of his) good deeds. And so far as the non-believers and hypocrites are concerned, there would be general announcement about them before all creation telling them that these (people, i.e. non-believers and hypocrites) told a lie about Allah.
[6670]
[6671]
'Abdullah b. K'ab, who was his (Ka'b's) guide as he became blind, reported that he heard from Ka'b b. Malik the story of his staying behind Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) from the expedition of Tabuk. The rest of the hadith is the same (but with this variation) that in the narration transmitted on the authority of Yunus (the words are): When Allah's Messenger (may. peace be upon him) intended to set on an expedition he kept It as a secret, but. be did not do so in thic. expedition. And in the narration transmitted on the authority of Muhammad b. Abdullah b. Muslim, there is no mention of Abu Khaithana (Allah be pleased with him) and no mention of his meeting with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[6672]
It is reported on the authority of Abdullah b. K'ab and he was the guide of Ka'b as he lost his eyesight and he was the greatest scholar amongst his people and he retained in his mind many ahadith of the Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He said: I heard my father Ka'b b. Malik, and he fas one of those three whose repentance was accepted (by Allah). He transmitted that He never lagged behind Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) from any expedition that he undertook except two expeditions; the rest of the hadith is the same, and in the tradition narrated through another chain of transmitters the words are: "That Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) set out on an expedition with a large number of persons more than ten thousand and this could not be recorded in the census register."
[6673]
Sa'id b. Musayyib, 'Urwa b. Zubair, 'Alqama b. Waqqas and 'Ubaidullah b. Abdullah b. 'Utba b. Mas'ud--all of them reported the story of the false allegation against 'A'isha, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). And they (the slanderers) said what they had to say, but Allah exonerated her of this charge and all of them reported a part of the hadith and some of them who had better memories reported more and with better retention, and I tried to retain this hadith (listening) from every one of them that they reported to me and some of them attested the other. (The sumaried substance of the false allegation is this): 'A'isha said: Whenever Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) intended to set out on a journey he cast lots amongst his wives and he took one with him in whose favour the lot was cast. It so happened that he cast lots amongst us while setting out on a battle and it was cast in my favour, so I set out along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). This relates to the period when the revelation concerning the commands of veil had been made. I was carried in a haudaj and I was brought down where we had to stay. In short, when we set out for return journey from the expedition and our caravan was near Medina, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded one night to march forward. I also got up when the command for the march was given and moved on until I went out of the encampments of the army and after relieving myself I came to my place. I touched my chest and found that my necklace which had been made of the stones of zafar had been broken. I retraced my steps and tried to search my necklace and this detained me there. The group of people who saddled my ride and placed my haudaj carrying me upon the camels marched on. They were under the impression that I was in it. The women in those days were light of weight and they did not wear much flesh, as they ate less food ; so they did not perceive the weight of my haudaj as they placed it upon the camel as I was a young girl at that time. So they drove the camel and Eet out and I found my necklace after the army had marched. I came to my place and there was none to call and none to respond (the call). I waited at my place under the impression that when the people would riot find me they would come back. So I kept sitting at my place. I was overpowered by sleep and slept. Safwan b. Mu'attal Sulami Dhakwini, who had lagged behind the army because of taking rest came to my place walking in the latter part of the night and he saw the body of a person who was asleep. He came to me and recognised me as he had seen rue before it was enjoined to observe purda. I got ap by his voice as he recited Inna lillahi wa inna ilaihi raji'un [we are for Allah and to Him we have to return.] and I covered my head with my headdress. By Allah, he did not speak to me a word and I did not hear a word from him except Inna lillahi. He made his camel kneel down and I amounted the camel as he pressed tLe camel's foreleg and he moved on leaning the camel by the nose string on which I was riding until we came to the army where it had encamped for rest because of extreme heat. Woe be upon those who harboured doubts about me and the most notorious among them was 'Abdullah b. Ubayy, the great hypocrite. We came to Medina and I fell sick for a month. The people had been deliberating over the statements of those who had brought these calumnies against me. I was absolutely unaware of anything concerning that. This, however, caused doubt in my mind that I did not see Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him.) treating me with such kindness with which he treated me as I fell ill before this. The Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him)would coome and greet me with Assalam-o-'Alaikum and only ask me how I was. This caused doubt in my mind, but I was unaware of the evil. I wept outside despite my failing health and there went along with me Umm Mistah and she said the daughter of Abu Rhm b. Muttalib b. 'Abd Manaf and his mother was the daughter of Sakhr b. 'Amir, the sister of the mother of Abu Bakr Sidiq and his son was Mistah b. Uthatha b. 'Abbad b. Muttalib. I and the daughter of Abu Rahm set towards the direction of my house . Something got into the head dress of Umm Mistah and she said: Woe be upon Mistah. And I said. Woe be upon what you say. Do you curse people who had participated in Badr? She said: Innocent woman, have you not heard what he said? I said: What did he say? She conveyed to me the statement of those who had brought false allegations against me. So my illness was aggravated. I went to my house and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to me and he greeted me and then said: How is that woman? I said: Do you permit me to go to the (house) of my parents? She (further) said: I had at that time made up my mind to confirm this news from them. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) permitted me. So I came to (the house of) my parents and said to my mother: Mother, do you know what the people are talking about? She said: My daughter, you should not worry. By Allah, if there is a handsome woman who is loved by her husband and he has co-wives also they talk many a thing about her. I said: Hallowed be Allah, what are the people talking about? I wept during the whole night until it was morning and I did not have a wink of sleep and I wept even in the morning. As the revelation was delayed (in regard to this matter), so Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) called 'Ali ibn Abi 'Talib and Usama b. Zaid in order to seek their advice in regard to the separation of his wife. Usama b. Zaid told Allah's Messenger (may peace be apen him) about the innocence of his wives and what he knew about his love for them. He said: Allah's Messenger, they are your wives and we know nothing else about thembut goodness. And as for 'Ali b. Abu Talib, he said: Allah has not put any unnecessary burden upon you (in regard to your wives). There are a number of women besides her and if you ask that maidservant (Barira) she will tell you the truth. So, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) called Bailra and said: Barira, did you see anything in 'A'isha which can cause doubt about her? Barira said: By Him Who sent thee with the truth, I have seen nothing objectionable in her but only this much that she is a young girl and she goes to sleep while kneading the flour and the lamb eats that. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) mounted the pulpit and sought vindication against 'Abdullah b. Ubayy b. Salul, and he further said: Who would exonerate me from imputations of that person who has troubled (me) in regard to my family? By Allah, I find nothing in my wife but goodness and the person whom the people have mentioned in this connection is, according to my knowledge, a thoroughly pious person, and he did never get into my house but along with me. Sa'd b. Mu'adh stood up and said: Allah's Messenger, I defend your honour against him. If he belong to the tribe of Aus we would strike his neck and if he belongs to the tribe of our brother Khazraj and you order us we would comply with your order. Then Sa'd b. 'Ubada stood up. He was chief of the Khazraj tribe. He was otherwise a pioas man but he had some what tribal partisanship in him and he said to Sa'd b. Mu'adh: By the everlasting existence of Allah. you are not stating the fact, you will not be able to kill him and you will not have the power to do so. Thereupon, Usaid b. Hudair stood up, and he was the first cousin of Sa'd b. Mu'adh and said to Sa'd b. 'Ubada: By the everlasting existence of Allah, you are not stating the fact. We would kill him. You are a hypocrite and so you argue in defence of the hypocrites, and thus both the tribes Aus and Khazraj were flared up, until they were about to fall upon one another and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) kept standing upon the pulpit and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) tried to subside their anger until they became silent and thus there was silence. 'A'isha further reported: I spent the whole day in weeping and even the night and could not have a wink of sleep even next night. My parents thought that this constant weeping of mine would break my heart. I wept and they sat beside me. In the meanwhile a woman of the Ansar came to see me. I permitted her to see me and she also began to weep. And we were in this very state that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came and he greeted me and then sat down. He had never sat with me since a month when this rumour was afloat, and there was no revelation (to clarity) my case. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) recited Tashahhud (there is no god but Allah and Muhammad is His Apostle) and then said: Coming to the point, 'A'isha, this is what has reached me about you and if you are innocent, Allah would Himself vindicate your honour, and if accidentally there has been a lapse on your part sock forgiveness of Allah; He will pardon thee for when a servant makes a confession of his fault and turns (to Him) penitently, Allah also turns to him (mercifully) accepting his repentance. When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) talked, my tears dried up and not even a single drop of tear was perceived by me (rolling out of my eyes). I said to my father: You give a reply to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on my behalf. He said: By Allah, I do not know what I should say to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). I then said to my mother: Give a reply to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on my behalf, but she said: By Allah, I do not know what I should say to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). I was a small girl at that time and I had not read much of the Qur'an (but I said): By Allah, I perceive that you have heard about this and it has settled down in your mind and you have taken it to be true, so if I say to you that I am quite innocent, and Allah knows that I am innocent, you would never believe me to be true, and if I confess to (the alleged) lapse before you, whereas Allah knows that I am completely innocent (and I have not committed this sin at all), in that case You will take me to be true and, by Allah, I, therefore, find no other alternative for me and for you except that what the father of Yousuf said: ,(My course is) comely patience. And Allah it is Whose help is to be sought for in that (predicament) which ye describe" (xii 18). After this I turned my face to the other side and lay down on my bed. By Allah, I was fully aware of this fact that I was innocent but I did not expect that Allah would descend Wahy Matlu (Qur'anic Wahy) in my case as I did not think myself so much important that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, would speak in this matter in words to be recited. I only hoped that Allah would in vision give an indication of my innocence to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) during his sleep. And, by Allah, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had not moved an inch from where he had been sitting and none from the members of my family had gone that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, descended revelation upon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) there and then and he felt the burden which he used to feel at the time of receiving revelation. He began to perspire because of the burden of words of Allah as they descended upon him even during the winter season and there fell the drops of his sweat like silvery beads. When this state of receiving revelation was over, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) smiled and the first words which he spoke to me were that he said: 'A'isha, there is glad tidings for you. Verily, Allah has vindicated your honour, and my mother who had been standing by me said: Get up (and thank him, i.e. the Holy Prophet). I said: By Allah, I shall not thank him and laud him but Allah Who has descended revelation vindicating my honour. She ('A'isha) said: Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, revealed: "'Verily, those who spread the slander are a gang among you" (and) ten (subsequent) verses in regard to my innocence. She further said: Abu Bakr used to give to Mistah (some stipend) as a token of kinship with him and for his poverty and he (Abu Bakr) said: By Allah, now I would not spend anything for him. 'A'isha said: It was upon this that Allah the Exalted and Glorious revealed this verse: "And let not those who possess dignity and ease among you swear to give to the near of the kin" up to "Yearn ye not that Allah may forgive you?" Hibban b. Musa' said that 'Abdullah b. Mubarak used to say: It is a verse contained in the Book which most (eminently) brightens the hope. Abu Bakr said: By Allah, I wish that Allah should pardon me. I shall never stop this stipend. So he continued to give him the stipend which he had withdrawn. 'A'isha said that Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) asked Zainab, daughter of Jahsh, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), about me what she knew or what she had seen in me, and she said: Allah's Messenger, I shall not say anything without hearing (with my ears) and seeing with my eyes. By Allah, I find nothing in her but goodness. (And she stated this in spite of the fact) that she was the only lady who amongst the wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) used to vie with me but Allah saved her in bringing false allegation against me because of her God-consciousness. Her sister Hamna bint Jahsh, however, opposed her and she was undone along with others.
[6674]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri through other chains of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording. In the hadith transmitters on the authority of 'Urwa, there is an addition of these words: "'A'isha did not like that Hassan should be rebuked in her presence and she used to say: It was he who wrote this verse also: "'Verily, my father and my mother and my honour, those are all meant for defending the honour of Muhammad against you." And 'Urwa further reported that 'A'isha said: By Allah, the person, about whom the allegation was trade used to say: Hallowed be Allah, by One, in Whose hand is my life, I have never unveiled any woman, and then he die,& as a martyr in the cause of Allah, and in the narration transmitted on the authority of Ya'qub b. Ibrahim., the word is Mu'irin and in the narration transmitted on the'authority of 'Abd al-Razzaq it is Mughirin. 'Abd b. Humaid said: I said to 'Abd al-Razzaq: What does this word Mughirin mean? And he said: Al- waghra means intense heat.
[6675]
'A'Isha reported: When I came under discussion what the people had to say about me, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood up for delivering an address and he recited tashahhud (I bear witness to the fact that iheie is no god but Allah) and praised Allah, lauded Him what He rightly deserves and then said: Coming to the point. Give me an advice about them who have brought false charge about my family. By Allah, I know no evil in the members of my family and the person in connection with whom the false charge is being levelled, I know no evil in him too. And he never entered my house but in my presence and when I was away on a journey, he remained with me even in that. The rest of the hadith is the same but with this change that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to my house and asked my maidservant and she said: By Allah, I know no fault in her but this that she sleeps, and goat comes and eats the kneaded flour. Some of the Companions (of the Holy Prophet) scolded her and said: State the fact before Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and they even made a pointed reference (to this incident). She said: gallowed be Allah. By Allah, I know about her as does the jeweller know about the pure piece of gold. And when this news reached the person in connection with whom the allegation was made he said: Hallowed be Allah. By Allah, I have never unveiled any woman. 'A'isha said: He fell as a martyr in the cause of Allah, and there is this addition in this hadith that the people who had brought false allegation amongst them were Mistah and Hamna and Hassan. And so far as the hypocrite 'Abdullah b. Ubayy is concerned, he was one who tried his best to gather the false news and then gave them the wind. And he was in fact a fabricator and there was Hamna, daughter of Jahsh with him.
[6676]
Anas reported that a person was charged with fornication with the slavegirl of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to 'Ali: Go and strike his neck. 'Ali came to him and he found him in a well making his body cool. 'Ali said to him: Come out, and as he took hold of his hand and brought him out, he found that his sexual organ had been cut. Hadrat 'Ali refrained from striking his neck. He came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, he has not even the sexual organ with him.
[6677]
Zaid b. Arqam reported: We set out on a journey along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in which we faced many hardships.'Abdullah b. Ubayy said to his friends: Do not give what you have in your possession to those who are with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) until they desert him. Zubair said: That is the reciting of that person who recited as min haulahu (from around him) and the other reciting is man haulahia (who are around him).And in this case when we would return to Medina the honourable would drive out the meaner therefrom (lxiv. 8).I came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and informed him about that and he sent someone to 'Abdullah b. Ubayy and he asked him whether he had said that or not. He took an oath to the fact that he had not done that and told that it was Zaid who had stated a lie to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).Zaid said: I was much perturbed because of this until this verse was revealed attesting my truth: "When the hypocrites come" (lxiii. 1). Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) then called them in order to seek forgiveness for them, but they turned away their heads as if they were hooks of wood fixed in the wall (lxiii. 4), and they were in fact apparently good-looking persons.
[6678]
Jabir reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came to the grave of 'Abdullah b. Ubayy, brought him out from that, placed him on his knee and put his saliva in his mouth and shrouded him in his own shirt and Allah knows best.
[6679]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to the grave of 'Abdullah b. Ubayy as he was placed in that.The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6680]
Ibn 'Umar reported that when 'Abdullah b. Ubayy b. Salul died. His son 'Abdullah b. 'Abdullah (b.Ubayy) came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and begged him that he should give him his shirt which he would use as a coffin for his father, he gave him that. He then begged that he should conduct funeral prayer for him. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had hardly got up to observe the prayer for him that 'Umar stood up and caught hold of the garment of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, are you going to conduct prayer for this man, whereas Allah has forbidden you to offer prayer for him? Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Allah has given me an option as He has said: "You may beg pardon for them or you may not beg pardon for them, and even if you beg pardon for them, seventy times" (ix. 80), and I am going to make an addition to the seventy. He was a hypocrite and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) offered prayer for him and Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, revealed this verse: "Do not offer prayer for any one of them at all and do not stand upon their graves for (offering prayer over them)" (ix. 84).
[6681]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah with the same chain of transmitters but with this addition: "He then abandoned offering (funeral) prayer for them."
[6682]
Ibn Mas'ud reported that there gathered near the House three persons amongst whom two were Quraishi and one was a Thaqafi or two were Thaqafis and one was a Quraishi. They lacked understanding but wore more flesh. One of them said: Do you think that Allah hears as we speak? The other one said: He does hear when we speak loudly and He does not hear when we speak in undertones, and still the other one said: If He listens when we speak loudly, He also listens when we speak in undertones. It was on this occasion that this verse was revealed: "You did not conceal yourselves lest your ears, your eyes and your skins would stand witness against you" (xli. 22).
[6683]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah through another chain of transmitters.
[6684]
Zaid b. Thabit reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) set out for Uhud. Some of those persons who were with them came back.The Companions of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) were divided in two groups. One group said: We would kill them, and the other one said: No, this should not be done, and it was on this occasion that this verse was revealed: "Why should you, then, be two parties in relation to hypocrites ?" (iv. 88).
[6685]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[6686]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported that during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) the hypocrites behaved in this way that when Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) set out for a battle, they kept themselves behind, and they became happy that they had managed to sit in the house contrary to (the act of) Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and when Allah's Apostle (may peace he upon him) came back, they put forward excuses and took oath and wished that people should laud them for the deeds which they had not done. It was on this occasion that this verse was revealed: "Think not that those who exult in what they have done, and love to be praised for what they have not done-think not them to be safe from the chastisement; and for them is a painful chastisement" (iii. 18).
[6687]
Humaid b. 'Abd al-Rahman b. 'Auf reported that Marwan said to Rafi', his chamberlain, that he should go to Ibn 'Abbas and ask him: If every one of us be punished for his being happy upon his deed and for his being praised for what he has not done, nobody would be saved from the torment. Ibn 'Abbas said: What you have to do with this verse? It has been in fact revealed in connection with the people of the Book." Then Ibn Abbas recited this verse: "When Allah took a covenant from those who had been given the Book: You shall explain it to people and shall not conceal this" (iii. 186), and then Ibn 'Abbas recited this verse: "Think not that those who exult in what they have done and love to be praised for what they have not done" (iii. 186). Ibn 'Abbas (further) said: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) asked them about something and then they concealed that and they told him something else and they went out and they thought that they had informed him as lie had asked them and they felt happy of what they had concealed.
[6688]
Qais reported: I said to 'Ammar: What is your opinion about that which you have done in case (of your siding with Hadrat 'Ali)? Is it your personal opinion or something you got from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? 'Ammar said: We have got nothing from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) which people at large did not get, but Hudhaifa told me that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had especially told him amongst his Companion, that there would be twelve hypocrites out of whom eight would not get into Paradise, until a camel would be able to pass through the needle hole. The ulcer would be itself sufficient (to kill) eight. So far as four are concerned, I do not remember what Shu'ba said about them.
[6689]
Qais b. 'Ubad reported: We said to 'Ammar: Was your fighting (on the side of 'Ali in the Battle of Siffin) a matter of your own choice or you got its hints from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) for it, is likely for one to err in one's own discretion or was it because of any covenant that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) got from you? He said: It was not because of any covenant that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) got from us which he did get from other people, and he further said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: "In my Ummah." And I think that Hudhaifa reported to me and according to Ghundar (the words are) that he said: In my Ummah, there would be twelve hypocrites and they would not be admitted to Paradise and they would not smell its odour, until the camel would pass through a needle's hole. Dubaila (ulcer) would be enough to (torment them)-a kind of flame of Fire which would appear in their shoulders and it would protrude from their chest.
[6690]
Abu Tufail reported that there was a dispute between Hudhaifa and one from the people of Aqaba as it happens amongst people. He said: I adjure you by Allah to tell me as to how many people from Aqaba were. The people said to him (Hudhaifa) to inform him as he had asked. We have been informed that they were fourteen and If you are to be counted amongst them, then they would be fifteen and I state by Allah that twelve amongst them were the enemies of Allah and of His Messenger (may peace be upon him) in this world. The rest of the three put forward this excuse: We did not hear the announcement of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and we were not aware of the intention of the people as he (the Holy Prophet) had been in the hot atmosphere. He (the Holy Prophet) then said: The water is small in quantity (at the next station). So nobody should go ahead of me, but he found people who had gone ahead of him and he cursed them on that day.
[6691]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who climbed this hill, the hill of Murar, his sins would be obliterated as were obliterated the sins of Bani Isra'il. So the first to take their horses were the people of Banu Khazraj. Then there was a ceaseless flow of persons and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to them: All of you are those who have been pardoned except the owner of a red camel. We came to him and said to him: You also come on, so that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) may seek forgiveness for you. But he said: By Allah, so far as I am concerned, the finding of something lost is dearer to me than seeking of forgiveness for me by your companion (the Holy Prophet), and he remained busy in finding out his lost thing.
[6692]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who would climb this hill of Murar. The rest of the hadith is the same but with this variation that it was a desert Arab who was finding out his lost thing.
[6693]
Anas b. Malik reported: There was a person amongst us who belonged to the tribe of Bani Najjar and he recited Sura al-Baqarah and Surat Al-i-'Imran and he used to transcribe for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He ran away as a rebel and joined the People of the Book. They gave it much importance and said: He is the person who used to transcribe for Muhammad and they were much pleased with him. Time rolled on that Allah caused his death. They dug the grave and buried him therein, but they found to their surprise that the earth had thrown him out over the surface. They again dug the grave for him and buried him but the earth again threw him out upon the surface. They again dug the grave for him and buried him but the earth again threw him out upon the surface. At last they left him unburied.
[6694]
Jabir reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came back from a journey and as he was near Medina, there was such a violent gale that the mountain seemed to be pressed. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: This wind has perhaps been made to blow for the death of a hypocrite, and as he reached Medina a notorious hypocrite from amongst the hypocrites had died.
[6695]
Iyas reported on the authority of his father: We went along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to visit a person suffering from fever. When I placed my hand upon him, I said: By Allah, I have never seen, till this day, a person running higher temperature than he. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), turning his face to his companions, said: May I not inform you of a severer temperature than this which these two persons would run on the Day of Resurrection? And they were two hypocrites riding upon the camel turning their back towards (the Muslims).
[6696]
Ibn Umar reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The similitude of a hypocrite is that of a sheep which roams aimlessly between two flocks. She goes to one at one time and to the other at another time.
[6697]
Ibn Umar reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) saying like this but with this change of words: "She sometimes finds a way in one flock and then in another flock."
[6698]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A bulky person would be brought on the Day of judgment and he would not carry the weight to the eye of Allah equal even to that of a gnat. Nor shall We set up a balance for them on the Day of Resurrection" (xviii. 105).
[6699]
Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported that a Jew scholar came to Allah's Apostle (may peace he upon him) and said. Muhammad, or Abu al-Qasim, verify, Allah, the Exalted and Glorious. would carry the Heavens on the Day of Judgment upon one finger and earths upon one finger and the mountains and trees upor one finger and the ocean and moist earth upon one finger-in fact the whole of the creation upon one finger, and then He would stir them and say: I am your Lord, I am your Lord. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) smiled testifying what that scholar had said. He then recited this verse: "And they honour not Allah with the honour due to Him; and the whole earth will be in His grip on the Day of Resurrection and the heaven* r*Utd up in His right hand. Glory be to Him I and highly Exalted is Re above what they associate (with Him)" (xxxix. 67).
[6700]
This hadlth has been narrated on the authority of Mansur with the same chain of truemittm (and the words are): A Jew scholar came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). The rest of the hadith is the same, but there is no mention of "then He would stir them. " But there is this addition: "I saw Allah's Messengcr (may peace be upon him) smiling so much that his front teeth appeared and testifying him (th Jew scholar); then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) recited the verse: "And they honour not Allah with the honour due to Him" (xxxix. 67).
[6701]
Abdullah reported that a person from the People of the Book came to Allah's Apostle (may peace he upon him) and said: Abu al-Qasim, verify, Allah would carry tho Reavmo upon one finger and the earths upon one finger and the trees and moist earth upon one finger and in fact the whole of the creation upon one finger and then say: I am your Lord. I an your Lord. And he (the narrator) further said: I saw Allah's Massenger(may peace be upon him) fooling so much hppy that his front teeth became visible and then he recited the Yeife: "And they honour not Allah with the honour due to Him" (xxxix. 67).
[6702]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[6703]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allan, the Exalted and Glorious, will take in His grip the earth ou the Day of Judgment and He would roll up the sky in His right hand and would say: I am the Lord; wbere are the sovereigns of the world?
[6704]
Abdullah b.'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying: Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, would fold the Heavens on the Day of Judgment and then He would place them on His tight hand and say: I am the Lord; where are the haughty and where are the proud (today)? He would fold the' earth (placing it) on the lef t hand and say: I am the Lord; where are the haughty and where are the proud (today) ?
[6705]
Abdullah b. Miqsam reported that he saw Abdullah b. Umar as he narrated Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, would take in His hand His Heavens and His Earth,and would say: I am Allah. And He would clench His fingers and then would open them (and say): I am your Lord. I saw the pulpit in commotion from underneath because of something (vib-ating)there. And (I felt this commotion so much) that I said (to myself): It may not fall with Allah's Massenger (may peace be upon him) upon it.
[6706]
Abdullah b. Miqsam reported that 'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported: I saw Allah'h Messenger (may peace be upon him) upon the pulpit and he was saying that the Mighty Lord, the Exalted and Glorious would take hold of the Heavens and earth in His hand. The rest of the hadith is the same,
[6707]
Abu Haraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) took hold of my hands and said: Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, created the clay on Saturday and He created the mountains on Sunday and He created the trees on Monday and He created the things entailing labour on Tuesday and created light on Wednesday and lie caused the animals to spread on Thursday and created Adam (peace be upon him) after 'Asr on Friday;the last creation at the last hour of the hours of Friday, i.e. between afternoon and night.
[6708]
Sahl b. Sa'd reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The people will be assembled on tee Day of Resurrection on a white plain with a reddish tinge like the loaf of white bread with no marks set up for anyone.
[6709]
'A'isha reported: I asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about the words of Allah, the Exalted and Glorious: "The day when the earth would be changed for another earth and Heaven would be changed for another Heaven (XiV. 48), (and inquired:) (Allah's Messenger), where would the people be on tnat day? He said: They would be on the Sirit.
[6710]
Abu al-Sa'id Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that the earth would turn to be one single bread on the Day of Resurrection and the Almighty would turn it in His hand as one of you turns a loaf while on a journey. It would be a feast arranged in the honour of the people of Paradise. He (the narrator) further narrated that a person from among the Jews came and he said: Abu al-Qasim, may the Compassionate Lord be pleased with you! May I inform you about the feast arranged in honour of the people of Paradise on the Day of Resurrection? He said: Do it, of course. He said: The earth would become one single bread. Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) looked towards us and laughed until his molar teeth became visible. He then again said: May I inform you about that with which they would season it? He said: Do it, of course. He said: Their seasoning would be balim and fish. The Companions of the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: What is this balam? He said: Ox and fish from whose excessive livers seventy thousand people would be able to eat.
[6711]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If ten scholars of the Jews would follow me, no Jew would be left upon the surface of the earth who would not embrace Islam.
[6712]
'Abdullah(b. Mas'ud) reported: As I was going aloog with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) in a cultivable land and he (the Holy Prophet) was walking with the support of a wood, a group of Jews happened to meet him. Some of them said to the others: Ask him about the Soul. They said: Wbat is your doubt about it? There is a possibility that you may ask him about anything (the answer of) which you may not like. They said: Ask him. So one amongst them asked him about the Soul. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) kept quiet and he gave no reply and I came to know that revelation was being sent to him, so I stood at my place and thus this revelation descended upon him: "They ask thee 'about Soul. Say: The Soul is by the Commandment of my Lord, and of Knowledge you are given but a little" (xvii. 58).
[6713]
Abdullah reported: I was walking along with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) in a field of Medina. The rest of the hadith is the same, but there is a slight variation of wording.
[6714]
Abdullah reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon h@) was reclining against a tree in the garden. The rest of the hadith is the same. but there is a slight variation of wording.
[6715]
Khabbab reported that al-As b. Wa'il owed debt to me. I came to him in order to demand that. He said: I will never repay you unless you belie Mubammad. I said: I would never belie Mubammad until you die and you are again raised up. He said: When I would be raised up after death, I would repay your debt when I would get my property and children back. Waki' said: This is how Almash has narrated and it was on this occasion that this verse was revealed: "Hast thou seen him who dis. believes in Our message and says: I shall certainly be given wealth and children' (xis, 77) up to "he would come to Us alone" (xiX. 80).
[6716]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Khabbib through another chain of transmitters and the words are. I in the pre-Islamic days used to work as an iron-smith. I did some work for 'As b. Wa'il and came to him for getting the remuneration of my wages.
[6717]
Anas b. Malik reported that Abu Jahl said: O Allah, if he is true, then shower upon us the volley of stones from the sky or inflict upon us a grievous torment, and it was on this occasion that this verse was revealed:"'Allah would never torment them so long as you are amongst them. And Allah is not going to torment them as long as they seek forgiveness. And why is it that Allah should not torment them and they prevent people from coming to the sacred mosque...."(viii. 34) to the end.
[6718]
Abu Huraira reported that Abu Jahl asked (people) whether Mubammad placed his face (on the ground) in their presence. It was said to him: Yes. He said : By Lit and Uzza. If I were to see him do that, I would trample his neck, or I would beamear his face with dust. He came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as he was engaged in prayer and thought of trampling his neck (and the people say) that he came near him but turned upon his heels and tried to repulse something with his hands. It was said to him: What is the matter with you ? He said : There is between me and him a ditch of fire and terror and wings. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) said: If he were to come near me the angels would have torn him to pieces. Then Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, revealed this verse- (the narrator) said: We do not whether it is the hadith transmitted te Abu Huraira or something conveyed to him from another source : "Nay, man is surely inordinate, because he looks upon himself as self-sufficient. Surely to thy Lord is the return. Hast thou seen him who forbids a servant when he prays ? Seest thou if he is on the right way, or enjoins observance of piety? Seest thou if he [Abu Jah]] denies and turns away? Knowest he not that Allah sees? Nay. if he desists not, We will seize him by the forelock-a lying, sinful forelock. Then let him summon his council. We will summon the guards of the Hell. Nay! Obey not thou him" (Icvi. 6-19). (Rather prostrate thyself.) Ubaidullah made this addition: It was after this that (prostration) was enjoined upon and Ibn Abd al-Ala made this addition that by Nadia he meant his people.
[6719]
Masruq reported: We were sitting in the company of Abdullah and he was lying on the bed that a person came and said: Abd Abd al-Rabmin, a story-teller at the gates of Kinda says that the verse (of the Qur'an) which deals with the "smoke" implies that which is about to come and it would hold the breath of the infidels and would inflict the believers with cold. Thereupon Abdullah got up and said in anger. O people, fear Allah and say only that which one knows amongst you and do not say which he does not know and he should simply say: Allah has the best knowledge for He has the best knowledge amongst all of you. It does not behove him to say that which he does not know. Allah has the best knowledge of it. Verily Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said to His Prophet (may peace be upon him) to state:"I do not ask from you any remuneration and I am not the one to put you in trouble," and when Allah's Mesqenger (may peace be upon him) saw people turning back(from religion) he said: O Allah, afflict thern with seven famines as was done in the case of Yusuf, so they were afflicted with famine by which they were forced to eat everything until they were obliged to eat the hides and the dead bodies because of hunger, and every one of them looked towards the sky and he found a smoke. And Abu Sufyan came and he said: Muhammad, you have come to command us to obey Allah and cement the ties of blood- relation whereas your people are undone ; supplicate Allah for tlicm. Thereupon Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said: "Wait for the day when there would be clear smoke from the sky which would envelop people and that would be grievous torivent" up to the words: "you are going to return to (evil)." (if this verse implied the torment of the next life) could the chastisement of the next (life) be averted (as the Qur'an states) : On the day when We seize (them) with the most violent seizing; surely We shall exact retribution" (xliv. 16) ? The seizing (in the hadith) implies that of the Day of Badr. And so far as the sign of smoke, seizing, inevitability and signs of Rome are concern- ed, they have become things of the past now.
[6720]
Masruq reported that there came to Abdullah a person and said: I have left behind in the mosque a man who explains the Qur'an according to his personal discretion and he explained this verse: "So wait for the day when the Heaven brings a clear smoke." He says that a smoke would come to the people on the Day of Resurrection anl it will withhold breath and they would be inflicted with cold. 'Abdullah said: He who has knowledge should say something and he who has no knowledge should simply say: Allah is best aware. This reflects the understanding of a person that he should say about that which he does not know that it is Allah who knows best. The fact is that when the Quraish disobeyed Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) he supplicated Allah that they should be afflicted with famine and starvation as was done in case of Yusuf. And they were so much hard pressed that a person would ace the sky and he would see between him and the sky something like smoke and they were so much hard pressed that they began to cat the bones, and a person came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger. seek forgiveness for the tribe of Mudar for (its people) have been undone. The Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: For Mudar? You are overbold, but he supplicated Allah for them. It was upon this that this verse was revealed: "We shall remove the chastisement a little, but they will surely return to evil" (xliv. 15). lie (the narrator) said: There was a downpoor of rain upon them. When there was some relief for them they returned to the same position as they had been before, and Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, revealed this verse: "So wait for the day when the heaven brings a clear smoke enveloping people. This is a grievous torment on the day when We seize them with the most violent seizing; surely, We shall exact retribution." And this (seizing) implied (Battle) of Badr.
[6721]
Abdullah said that five signs have (become things) of the past (and have proved the truth of the Holy Prophet) : (Enveloping) by the smoke, inevitable (punishment to the Meccans at Badr), (the victory of) Rome, (violent) seizing (of the Meccans at Badr) and (the splitting up of) the Moon.
[6722]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[6723]
Ubayy b. Ka'b reported that the words of Allah, the Exalted and Glorious: "We will, surely, make them taste the lesser punishment before the severer punishment (that haply they may return)" (xxxii. 21) imply the torments of the world. (victory of) Rome, seizing (of the Meccans), or smoke. And Shalba was in doubt about seizing or smoke.
[6724]
Abu Ma'mar reported on the authority of Abdullah that the moon was split up during lifetime by Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in two parts and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Bear testimony to this.
[6725]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abdullah b. Mas'ud (who said): We were along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) at Mina, that moon was split up into two. One of its parts was behind the mountain and the other one was on this side of the mountain. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upbn him) said to us: Bear witness to this.
[6726]
'Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported that the moon was split up in two parts during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). The mountain covered one of its parts and one part of it was above the mountain and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Bear witness to this.
[6727]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Shu'ba with a slight variation of wording.
[6728]
Anas reported that the people of Mecca demanded from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that he should show them (some) signs (miracles) and he showed tlicin the splitting of the moon. This hadlth has been narrated on the authority of Anas through another chain of transmitters.
[6729]
Anas reported that the moon was split up in two parts and in the hadith recorded in Abu Dawud, the words are: "The moon was split up into two parts during the life of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)."
[6730]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that the moon was split up during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him).
[6731]
AbU Musa reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: There is none to show more patience at listening to the most irksome things than Allah, the Exalted and Glorious.' Partnership is associated to Him (polytheism). and (fatherhood) of a child is attributed to HiM, but in spite of this He protects them (people) and provides them sustenance. This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Muas with a slight variation of wording.
[6732]
Abdullah b. Qais reported from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that none is more forbearing in listening to the most irksome things than Allah, the Exalted. They associate rivals with him, attribute sonhood to Him, but in spite of this He provides them sustenance, grants them safety, confers upon them so many things.
[6733]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah, the Exalted and High, would say to one who shall have to undergo the least torture (on the Day of Resurrection): Would you like to go as ransom if you had all worldly riches; he would say: Yes. Allah would say to him: When you were in the loins of Adam, I demadded from you something easier than this that you should not associate anything with Me. (The narrator says): I think He also said: I would not cause you to enter Hell-Fire but you defied and attributed Divinity (to others besides Me).
[6734]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik through another chain of transmitters, but with a slight variation of wording (and the words are): I shall cause him to enter Hell." (The words subsequent to these) have not been mentioned.
[6735]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be u n him) said: It would be said to the non-believers on the Day of Resurrection: If you were to possess gold, filling the whole earth, would you like to secure your freedom by paying that? He would say: Yes. Thereupon it would be said to him: Something easier (than this) was demanded from you (but you paid no heed to it).
[6736]
Anas reported this hadlth through another chain of transmitters and the words are: "It would be said to him: You have told a lie; what had been demanded from you was quite easier than this (the belief in the Oneness of Allah)."
[6737]
Anas b. Malik reported that a person said: Allah's Messenger, how the non-believers would be made to assemble on the Day of Resurrection (by crawling) on their faces? Thereupon he said: Is He Who is powerfnl to make them walk on their feet is not powerful enough to make them (crawl) upon their faces on the Day of Resurrection? Qatada said: Of conrse, it is so. (He adjured): By the might of our Lord.
[6738]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said that one amongst the denizens of Hell who had led a life of ease and plenty amongst the people of the world would be made to dip in Fire only once on the Day of Resurrection and then it would be said to him: O, son of Adam, did you find any comfort, did you happen to get any material blessing? He would say: By Allah, no, my Lord. And then that person from amongst the persons of the world be brought who had led the most miserable life (in the world) from amongst the inmates of Paradise .and he would be made to dip once in Paradise and it would be said to him. 0, son of Adam, did you face,any hardship? Or had any distress fallen to your lot? And he would say: By Allah, no, 0 my Lord, never did I face any hardship or experience any distress.
[6739]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Verily, Allah does nut treat a believer unjustly in regard to his virtues. He would confer upon him (His blessing) in this world and would give him reward in the Hereafter. And as regards a non-believer. he would be made to taste the reward (of virtue in this world) what as has done for himself so much that when it would be the Hereafter. he would find no virtue for which he should be rewarded.
[6740]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) thus told him: When a non-believer does good he is made to taste Its reward in this world. And so far as the believer is concerned, Allah stores (the reward) of his virtues for the Hereafter and provides him sustenance in accordance with his obedience to Him.
[6741]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik through another chain of transmitters.
[6742]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Similitude of a believer is that of (a standing) crop which the air continues to toss from one side to another; in the same way a believer always (receives the strokes) of misfortune. The similitude of a hypocrite is that of a cypress tree which does not move until it is uprooted.
[6743]
This badith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters, but with a slight variation of wording.
[6744]
Ka'b reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said that the similitude of a believer is that of a standing crop in a field which is shaken by wind and then it comes to its original position but it stands at its roots. The similitude of a non-believer is that of a cypress tree which stands on its roots and nothing shakes it but it is uprooted (with) one (violent stroke).
[6745]
Ka'b b. Malik reported on the authority of his father that the similitude of a believer is that of a standing crop. The wind sometimes shakes it and sometimes raises it up and then it comes to its destined end. And the similitude of a hypocrite is that of a cypress tree which is not affected by anything but is uprooted once for all. This badith has been narrated through another chain, of transmitters also.
[6746]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Ka'b through another chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[6747]
'Abdullah b. Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: There is a tree amongst trees, the leaves of which do not wither and that is like a Muslim; tell me which that (tree) can be? The people began to think of the trees of the forest. Abdullah said: I thought that it could be the date-palm tree, but I felt hesitant (to say that). They (the Companions) then said: Allah's Messenger, (kindly) tell us which that can be? Thereupon he said:It is the date-palm tree. I made a mention of that to 'Umar, whereupon he said: Had you said that it meant the date-palin tree, this statement of yours (would have been dearer to me) than such and such things.
[6748]
Ibn Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) one day said to his Companions: Tell me about a tree which has resemblance with a believer. The people began to mention (different) trees of the forest. Ibn 'Umar said: It was instilled in my mind or in my heart and it stuck therein that it implied the date- palm tree. I made up my mind to make a mention of that but could not do that because of the presence of the elderly people there. When there was a hush amongst them (after they had expressed their views), Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: It Is the date-palm tree.
[6749]
Mujahid said: (I have had the privilege) of accompanying Ibn 'Umar up to Medina but I did not hear him narrate anything from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) except one hadith. And he said: We were in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that there was brought to him the kernel of a date. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6750]
Mujahid reported: I heard Ibn 'Umar as saying: There was brought to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) the kernel. The rest of the hadith is tile same.
[6751]
Ibn Umar reported: We were'in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that he said: Tell me of a tree which has resemblance to a Muslim and the leaves of which do not wither. Ibrahim said that perhaps Imam Muslim had stated like this: It constantly bears fruit but I have, however, seen [It does not bear fruit constantly]. Ibn Umar said: It crossed my mind that it could be the date-palm tree, but as I saw Aba Bakr and Umar observe silence, I did not deem it fit that I should speak or I should say something. 'Umar said: Had you said so, it would have been dearer to me than such and such thing.
[6752]
Jabir reported: I heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Verily, the Satan has lost all hopes that the worshippers would ever worship (him) in the peninsula of Arabia, but he (is hopeful) that he would sow the seed of dissension amongst them.
[6753]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[6754]
Jabir reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: The throne of Iblis is upon the ocean and he sends detachments (to different parts) inorder to put people to trial and the most important figure in his eyes is one who is most notorious in sowing the seed of dissension.
[6755]
Jabir reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Iblis places his throne upon water; he then sends detachments (for creating dissension); the nearer to him in tank are those who are most notorious in creating dissension. One of them comes and says: I did so and so. And he says: You have done nothing. Then one amongst them comes and says: I did not spare so and so until I sowed the seed of discord between a husband and a wife. The Satan goes near him and says: 'You have done well. A'mash said: He then embraces him.
[6756]
Jabir reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upqn him) said: The Satan sends detachments of his own in order to put people to trial and the highest in rank, in his eyes, is one who is most notorious in sowing the seed of dissension.
[6757]
Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: There is none amongst you with whom is not an attache from amongst the jinn (devil). They (the Companions) said: Allah's Messenger, with you too? Thereupon he said: Yes, but Allah helps me against him and so I am safe from his hand and he does not command me but for good.
[6758]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Mansiir with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[6759]
A'isha the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported that one day Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came out of her (apartment) during the night and she felt jealous. Then he came and he saw me (in what agitated state of mind) I was. He said: A'isha, what has happened to you? Do you feel jealous? Thereupon she said: How can it he (that a woman like me) should not feel jealous in regard to a husband like you. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: It was your devil who had come to you, and she said: Allah's Mes- senger, is there along with me a devil? He said: Yes. I said: Is devil attached to everyone? He said: Yes. I (Aisha) again said: Allah's Messenger, is it with you also? He said: Yes, but my Lord has helped me against him and as such I am ab solutely safe from his mischief.
[6760]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None amongst you would attain salvation purely because of his deeds. A person said: Allah's Messenger, even you also. Thereupon he said: Yes. Not even I, but that Allah wraps me in Mercy, but you should act with moderation.This badith has been transmitted on the authority of Bukair b. al-Ashajj with a slight variation of wording.
[6761]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is none whose deeds alone would entitle him to get into Paradise. It was said to him: And, Allah's Messenger, not even you? Thereupon he said: Not even I, but that my Lord wraps me in Mercy.
[6762]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is none amongst you whose deeds alone would attain salvation for him. They (the Companions) said: Allah's Messenger, not even you? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Not even I, but that Allah wraps me in Mercy and He grants me pardon. Ibn 'Aun pointed towards his head with his hand saying: Not even I, but that Allah wraps me in His Forgiveness and Mercy.
[6763]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is none whose deeds alone can'secure salvation for him. They said: Allah's Messenger, not even you? Thereupon he said: Not even I, but that,the Mercy of Allah should take hold of me.
[6764]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None amongst you can get. into Paradise by virtue of his deeds alone. They said: Allah's Messenger, not even you? Thereupon he said: Not even I, but that Allah should wrap me in His Grace and Mercy.
[6765]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Observe moderation in deeds (and if it is not possible, try to be near moderation) and understand that none amongst you can attain salvation because of his deeds alone. They said: Allah's Messenger, not even you? Thereupon he said: Not even I, but that Allah should wrap me in His Mercy and Grace.
[6766]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Jabir through another chain of transmitters.
[6767]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of A'mash through two other chains of transmitters. The wording is, however, the same.
[6768]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters with this addition: "Give them glad tidings".
[6769]
Jabir reported: I heard Allah's Apoetle (may peace be upon him) as saying: None of you would get into Paradise because of his good deeds alone, and he would not be rescued from Fire, not even I, but because of the Mercy of Allah.
[6770]
A'isha, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to say: Observe moderation (in doing deeds), and if yciu fail to observe it perfectly, try to do as much as you can do (to live up to this ideal of moderation) and be happy for none would be able to get into Paradise because of his deeds alone.They (the Companions of the Holy Prophet) said: Allah's Messenger, not even thou? Thereupon he said: Not even I, but that Allah wraps me in His Mercy, and bear this in mind that the deed loved most by Allah is one which is done constantly even though it is insignificant.
[6771]
This badith has been narrated on the authority of Musa b. 'Uqba with the same chain of transmitters and he did not make a mention of: "Be happy".
[6772]
Mughira b. Shu'ba reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) worshipped so much that his feet were swollen. It was said to him: (Why do you undergo so much hardship despite the fact that) Allah has pardoned for you your earlier and later sins? Thereupon he said: May I not (prove myself) to be a grateful servant (of Allah)?
[6773]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Mughira b. Shu'ba and the words are: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) kept standing in prayer (for such long hours) that his feet were swollen. They (his Companions) said: Verily, Allah has pardoned for thee the earlier and the later of thine sins. Thereupon he said: Should I not prove myself to be a grateful servant (of Allah)?
[6774]
A'isha reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) occupied himself in prayer, he observed such a (long) qiylm (posture of standing in prayer) that his feet were swollen. A'isha said: Allah's Messenger you do this (in spite of the fact) that your earlier and later sins have been pardoned for you? Thereupon, he said. A'isha should I not prove myself to be a thanksgiving servant (of Allah)?
[6775]
Shaqiq reported: We were sitting at the door of Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) waiting for him (to come out and deliver a sermon to us). It was at this time that there happened to pass by us Yazid b. Mu'awiya an-Nakha'i. We said: Inform him ('Abdullah b. Mas'ud) of our presence here. He went in and Abdullah b. Mas'ud lost no time in coming out to us and said:I was informed of your presence here but nothing hindered me to come out to you but the fact that I did not like to bore you (by stuffing your minds with sermons) as Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not deliver us sermon on certain days fearing that it might prove to be boring for us.
[6776]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah through other chains of transmitters.
[6777]
Shaqiq b. Wi'il reported that 'Abdullah used to give us sermon on every Thursday. A person said: Abu 'Abd al-Rahman, we love your talk and so we yearn (to listen to you) and earnestly desire that you should deliver us lecture every day. Thereupon he said: There is nothing to hinder me in giving you talk (every day) but the fact that you may be bored. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not deliver sermons on certain days (fearing that we might be bored).
[6778]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Paradise is surrounded by hardships and the Hell-Fire is surrounded by temptations.
[6779]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters.
[6780]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying that: Allah the Exalted and Glorious, said: I have prepared for My pious servants which no eye has ever seen, and no ear has ever heard, and no human heart has ever perceived but it is testified by the Book of Allah. He then recited: "No soul knows what comfort has been concealed from them, as a reward for what they did". (xxxii.17)
[6781]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said: I have prepared for My pious servants which no eye (has ever) seen, no ear has (ever) heard and no human heart has ever perceived those bounties leaving apart (those bounties) about which Allah has informed you.
[6782]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said: I have prepared for My pious servants which the eye has seen not, and the ear has heard not and no human heart has ever perceived such bounties leaving aside those about which Allah has informed you. He then recited: "No soul knows what comfort has been hidden for thein".
[6783]
Sahl b. Sa'd as-Sa'idi reported: I was in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that he gave a description of Paradise and then Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) concluded with these words: There would be bounties which the eye has not seen and the ear has not heard and no human heart has ever perceived them. He then recited this verse: "They forsake (their) beds, calling upon their Lord in fear and in hope, and spend out of what We have given them. So no soul knows what refreshment of the eyes is hidden for them: a reward for what they did" (xxxii. 16-17)
[6784]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: In Paradise, there is a tree under the shadow of which a rider can travel for a hundred years.
[6785]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters with the addition of these words: "He will not be able to cover this distance."
[6786]
Sahl b. Sa'd reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: In Paradise, there is a tree under the shadow of which a rider can travel for a hundred years without covering (the distance) completely. This hadith has also been transmitted on the authority of Abu Sa'id al-Khudri that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) is reported to have said: In Paradise, there is a tree under the shadow of which a rider of a fine and swift-footed horse would travel for a hundred years without covering the distance completely. There would be the pleasure of Allah for the inmates of Paradise and He would never be annoyed with them.
[6787]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said that Allah would say to the inmates of Paradise: O, Dwellers of Paradise, and they would say in response: At thy service and pleasure, our Lord, the good is in Thy Hand. He (the Lord) would say: Are you well pleased now? They would say: Why should we not be pleased, O Lord, when Thou hast given us what Thou hast not given to any of Thy creatures? He would, however, say: May I not give you (something) even more excellent than that? And they would say: 0 Lord, what thing can be more excellent than this? And He would say: I shall cause My pleasure to alight upon you and I shall never be afterwards annoyed with you.
[6788]
Sahl b. Sa'd reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The inmates of Paradise will look to the upper apartment of Paradise as you see the planets in the sky. I narrated this hadith to Nu'man b. Abi 'Ayyash and he said: I heard Abu Sa'id al-Khudri as saying: As you see the shining planets in the eastern and western (sides of) horizon.
[6789]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Hazim through another chain of transmitters.
[6790]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The inmates of Paradise would see the inmates of the apartment over them just as you see the shining planets which remain in the eastern and the western horizon because of the superiority some have over others. They said : Allah's Messenger, would in these abodes of Apostles others besides them not be able to reach? He said: Yes, they will, by Him, in Whose hand is my life, those who believe in God and acknowledge the Truth, will reach them.
[6791]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The people most loved by me from amongst my Ummah would be those who would come after me but everyone amongst them would have the keenest desire to catch a glimpse of me even at the cost of his family and wealth.
[6792]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: In Paradise there is a street to which they would come every Friday. The north wind will blow and would scatter fragrance on their faces and on their clothes and would add to their beauty and loveliness, and then they would go back to their family after having an added lustre to their beauty and loveliness, and their family would say to them: By Allah, you have been increased in beauty and loveliness after leaving us, and they would say: By Allah, you have also increased in beauty and loveliness after us.
[6793]
Muhammad reported that some (persons) stated with a sense of pride and some discussed whether there would be more men in Paradise or more women. It was upon this that Abu Huraira reported that Abu'l Qasim (the Holy Prophet) (may peace be upon him) said: The (members) of the first group to get into Paradise would have their faces as bright as full moon during the night, and the next to this group would have their faces as bright as the shining stars in the sky, and every person would have two wives and the marrow of their shanks would glimmer beneath the flesh and there would be none without a wife in Paradise.
[6794]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters.
[6795]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The (members of the) first group which would get into Paradise will have their faces as bright as stars in the sky. They would neither pass water, nor void excrement, nor will they suffer from catarrh, nor will they spit, and their combs would be made of gold, and their sweat will be musk, the fuel of their brazier will be aloes, and their wives will be large-eyed maidens and their form would be alike as one single person after the form of their father (Adam) sixty cubits tall.
[6796]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The first group of my Ummah to get into Paradise would be like a full moon in the night. Then those who would be next to them; they would be like the most significantly glittering stars in regard to brightness, then after them (others) in ranks. They would neither void excrement, nor pass water, nor suffer from catarrh, nor would they spit. And their combs would be made of gold, and the fuel of their braziers would be aloes and their sweat would be musk and their form would be the form of one single person according to the length of their father sixty cubits tall. This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn Abi Shaiba with a slight variation of wording.
[6797]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported: These are some of the ahidith which Abu Huraira reported from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and one is this that he is reported to have said: The (members of the) first group that would be admitted to Paradise would have their faces as bright as full moon during the night. They would neither spit nor suffer catarrh, nor void excrement. They would have their utensils and their combs made of gold and silver and the fuel of their braziers would be aloes and their sweat would be musk and every one of them would have two spouses (so beautiful) that the marrow of their shanks would be visible through the flesh. There would be no dissension amongst them and no enmity in their hearts. Their hearts would be like one heart, glorifying Allah morning and evening.
[6798]
Jabir reported: I heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying that the inmates of Paradise would eat and drink but would neither spit, nor pass water, nor void excrement, nor suffer catarrah. It was said: Then, what would happen with food? Thereupon he said: They would belch and sweat (and it would be over with their food), and their sweat would be that of musk and they would glorify and praise Allah as easily as you breathe.
[6799]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of A'mash with a slight variation of wording.
[6800]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said that the inmates of Paradise would eat therein and they would also drink, but they would neither void excrement, nor suffer catarrh, nor pass water, and their eating (would be digested) in the form of belching and their sweat would be musk aged they would glorify and praise Allah as easily ai you breathe.
[6801]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Jabir with a slight variation of wording.
[6802]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who would get into Paradise (would be made to enjoy such an everlasting) bliss that he would neither become destitute, nor would his clothes wear out, nor his youth would decline.
[6803]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri and Abu Huraira both reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would be an announcer (in Paradise) who would make this announcement: Verily I there is in store for you (everlasting) health and that you should never fall ill and that you live (for ever) and do not die at all. And that you would remain young and never grow old. And that you would always live in affluent circumstances and never become destitute, as words of Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, are: "And it would be announced to them: This is the Paradise. You have been made to inherit it for what you used to do".(VII; 43)
[6804]
Abu Bakr b. Abdullah b. Qais reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said that in Paradise there would be for a believer a tent of a single hollowed pearl the breadth of which would be sixty miles. It would be meant for a believer and the believers would go around it and none would be able to see the others.
[6805]
Abu Bakr b. Abdullah b. Qais reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said that in Paradise there would be a tent made of a single hollowed pearl, the breadth of which would be sixty miles from all sides and there would live a family in each corner and the other would not be able to see the believer who goes around them.
[6806]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Bakr b. Abu Musa b. Qais who, on the authority of his father, reported the Apostle (may peace be upon him) to have said that there would be a tent made of a pearl whose height towards the sky would be sixty miles. In each corner, there would be a fanaily of the believer, out of sight for the others.
[6807]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Saihan, Jaihan, Euphrates and Nile are all among the rivers of Paradise.
[6808]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would enter Paradise people whose hearts would be like those of the hearts of birds.
[6809]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, created Adam in His own image with His length of sixty cubits, and as He created him He told him to greet that group, and that was a party of angels sitting there, and listen to the response that they give him, for it would form his greeting and that of his offspring. He then went away and said: Peace be upon you ! They (the angels) said : May there be peace upon you and the Mercy of Allah, and they made an addition of "Mercy of Allah". So he who would get into Paradise would get in the form of Adarn, his length being sixty cubits, then the people who followed him continued to diminish in size up to this day.
[6810]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Hell would he brought on that da (the Day of judgment) with seventy bridles and every bridle would be controlled by seventy angels.
[6811]
Abil Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as seying: The fire which sons of Adam burn is only one-seventieth part of the Fire of Hell. His Companions said: By Allah, even ordinary fire would have been enough (to burn people). Thereupon he said: It is sixty-nine parts in excess of (the heat of) fire in this world each of them being equivalent to their heat.
[6812]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abn Huraira through another chain of transmitters with a slight variation of wording.
[6813]
Abu Huraira reported: We were in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that we heard a terrible sound. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Do you know what (sound) is this? We said: Allah and His Messenger know best. Thereupon he said: That is a stone which was thrown seventy years before in Hell and it has'been constantly slipping down and now it has reached its base.
[6814]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abfi Huraira with the same chain of transmitters but with this change of wording that the Holy Prophet (may.peace be upon him) said: It reached at its base and you heard its sound.
[6815]
Samura b. Jundub reported Allah's Apostle (may peace -be upon him) as saying: There will be some to whose ankels the fire will reach, some to whose knees, some to whose waist the fire will reach, and some to whose collar-bone the fire will reach.
[6816]
Samura b. Jundub reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would be among them those to whom the fire will reach up to their ankels and to some of them the fire would reach their knees and to some it would reach their waists and to some it would reach up to their collar-bones.
[6817]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[6818]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as say- ing: There was a dispute between the Hell and the Paradise and it (the Hell) said: The haughty and the proud would find abode in me. And the Paradise said: The meek and the humble would find their abode in me. Thereupon Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, (addressing the Hell) said: You are (the means) of My punishment by which I punish those of My servants whom I wish. (And addressing the Paradise) He said: You are only My Mercy by means of which I shall show mercy to those whom I wish, but each one of you would be full.
[6819]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as say- ing : The Hell and the Paradise fell into dispute and the Hell said: I have been dis- tinguished by the proud and the haughty. And the Paradise said: What is the matter with me that the meek and the humble amongst people and the downtrodden and the simple enter me? Thereupon Allah said to the Paradise: You are (the means) of My Mercy whereby I show mercy to those of My servants whom I wish, and He said to the Hell: You are (the means) of punishment whereby I punish those of My servants whoml wish. Both of you will be full. The Hell will riot be filled up until Allah puts down His foot in it. The Hell would say: Enough, enough, enough, and at that time it will be filled up, all its parts integrated together.
[6820]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Paradise and the Hell disputed with each other. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6821]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported that Abu Huraira narrated to them some ahadith of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and one of them is this that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The Paradise and the Hell fell into dispute and the Hell said: I have been distinguished for accommodating (the haughty and proud in me), and the Paradise said: What is the matter that the meek and the humble and the downtrodden and simple would find an abode in me? Thereupon Allah said to Paradise: You are a (means) of My Mercy. I shall show mercy through you to one whom I will from amongst My servants. And lie said to the Hell: You are a (sign) of My chastisement and I shall chastise through you anyone whom I will from amongst My servants and both of you,would be full. And as regards the Hell it would not be full until Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, places His foot therein, and it would say: Enough, enough, enough, and it would be then full and the one part would draw very close to the other one and Allah would not treat unjustly anyone amongst His creation and He would create another creation for the Paradise (to accommodate it).
[6822]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The Paradise and the Hell disputed with each other. The rest of the hadith is the same as transmitted by Abu Huraira up to the words'. "It is essential for Me to fill up both of you."
[6823]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said that the Hell would continue to say: Is there anything more, until Allah, the Exalted and High, would place His foot therein and that would say: Enough, enough, by Your Honour, and some parts of it would draw close to the other.
[6824]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas through another chain of transmitters.
[6825]
'Abd al-Wahhab b. Ata' reported in connection with the words of Allah, the Exalted and the Glorious: We would say to Hell on the Day of Ressurection: Have you been completely filled up? and it would say: Is there anything -more? And he stated on the authority of Anas b. Malik that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: (The sinners) would be thrown therein and it would continue to say: Is there anything more, until Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, would keep His foot there- in and some of its part would draw close to the other and it would say: Enough, enough, by Thy Honour and by Thy Dignity, and there would be enough space in Paradise until Allah would create a new creation and He would make them accommo- date that spare place in Paradise.
[6826]
Anas reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would be left some space in Paradise as Allah would like that to be left. Then Allah would create another creation as He would like.
[6827]
Abu Sa'id reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Death would be brought on the Day of Resurrection.in the form of a white-coloured ram. Abu Kuraib made this addition: Then it would be made to stand between the Paradise and the Hell. So far as the rest of the hadith is concerned there is perfect agreement (between the two narrators) and it would be said to the inmates of Paradise: Do you recognise this? They would raise up their necks and look towards it and say: Yes,' it is death. Then it would be said to the inmates of Hell-Fire.. Do you recognise this? And they would raise up their necks and look and say: Yes, it is death. Then command would be given for slaughtering that and then it would be said: 0 inmates of Paradise,,there is an everlasting life for you and no death. And then (addressing) to the inmates of the Hell-Fire, it would be said: 0 inmates of Hell-Fire, there is an everlasting living for you and no death. Allah's Messenger (may peace be u@on him) then recited this verse pointing with his hand to this (material) world: "Warn them, this Day of dismay, and when their affairs would be decided and they would be un- mindful and they believe not" (xix. 39).
[6828]
Abu Sa'id reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When the inmates of Paradise would be admitted to Paradise and the inmates of Hell would be admitted to Hell, it would be said (to the inmates of Paradise): 0 inmates of Paradise. The rest of the hadith is the same but with this variation (that he only) said. That is the word of Allah, the Exalted. And he did not say: Then Allah's Mes- senger (may peace be upon him) recited, and he did not make a mention of his having pointed with his hand towards the (material) world.
[6829]
Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Allah would admit the inmates of Paradise into Paradise and the inmates of Hell into Hell. Then the announcer would stand between them and say: 0 inmates of Paradise, there is no death for you, 0 inmates of Hell, there is no death for you. You would live for ever therein.
[6830]
Umar b. Muhammad b. Zaid b. 'Abdullah b. 'Umar b. al-Khattab reported on the authority of his father Abdullah b. Umar that Allah's Messenger (may peace big upon him) said: When the inmates of Paradise would go to Paradise and the inmates of Hell would go to Hell, death would be called and it would be placed between the Paradise and the Hell and then slaughtered and then the announcer would announce: 0 inmates of Paradise, no death 0 Inmates of Hell-Fire, no death. And it would in. crease the delight of the inmates of Paradise and it would increase the grief of the inmates of Hell-Fire.
[6831]
It is transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The molar tooth of an unbeliever or the canine teeth of an unbeliever will be like Ubud and the thickness of his skin a three night's journey.
[6832]
Abu Huraira reported directly from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that he said: The distance of the two shoulders of the non-believer in Hell will be a three-day journey for a swift rider.
[6833]
Haritha b. Wahb reported that he heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: May I not inform you about the inmates of Paradise? They said: Do this, of course. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Every humble person who is considered to be humble if he were to adjure In the name of Allah, He would fulfil it. He then said: May I not inform you about the denizens of Hell-Fire? They said: Yes. And he said: Every haughty, fat and proud (person).
[6834]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[6835]
Haritha b. Wahb al-KhuzaIi reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: May I not inform you about the inmates of Paradise? (And then informing about them) said: Every meek person who is considered to be humble and if they were to adjure in the name of Allah, Allah would certainly fulfil it. May I not inform you about the inmates of Hell-Fire? They are all proud, mean and haughty.
[6836]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as say- ing: Many a people with dishevelled hair are driven away from the door (but they are so pious) that if they are to swear in the name of Allah, He would definitely fulfil that.
[6837]
'Abdullah b. Zam'a reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) delivered an address and he made a mention of the dromedary and also made a mention of one (base person) who cut off Its hind legs, and he recited: "When the basest of them broke forth with mischief" (xei. 12). When A mischievous person, strong even because of the strength of a family like Abu Zam'a, broke forth. He then delivered instruction in regard to the women saying: There is amongst you who beats his woman, and in the narration on the authority of Abu Bakr, the words are: He flogs her like a slave-girl. And in the narration of Abu Kuraib (the words are): He flogs like a slave and then comforts his bed with the help of that at the end of the day, and he then advised in regard to laughing of people at the breaking of wind and said: One of you laughs at that which you yourself do.
[6838]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as say- ing: I saw 'Amr b. Luhayy b. Qam'a b. Khindif, brother of Bani Ka'b, dragging his Intestines in Fire.
[6839]
Sa'id b. Musayyib explained "al-bahira" as that animal which is not milked but for the idols. and none amongst the people milks them, and "as-sa'iba" as that animal which is let loose for the deities. Nothing is loaded over it, and Ibn Musayyib narrated that Abu Huraira stated that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I saw 'Amr b. 'Amir al-Khuzili dragging his intestines in fire and he was the first who devoted animals to deity.
[6840]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Two are the types amongst the denizens of Hell, the one possessing whips like the tail of an ox and they flog people with their help. (The second one) the women who would be naked in spite of their being dressed, who are seduced (to wrong paths) and seduce others with their hair high like humps. These women would not get into Paradise and they would not perceive the odour of Paradise, although its frag- rance can be perceived from such and such distance (from great distance).
[6841]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If you survive for a time you would certainly see people who would have whips in their hands like the tail of an ox. They would get up in the morning under the wrath of Allah and they would get into the evening with the anger of Allah.
[6842]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If you live for a time, you would certainly see people get up (in the morning) in the wrath of Allah and getting into the evening under the curse of Allah, and there would be in their hands (whips) like the tail of an ox.
[6843]
This hadith has been narrated through five different chains of transmitters and all of them are narrated on the authority of Mustaurid, brother of Bani Fihr, that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: By Allah, this world (is so insigni- ficant in comparison) to the Hereafter that if one of you should dip his finger-(and wnile saying this Yahyg pointed with his forefinger)-in the ocean and then he should see as to what has stuck to it. This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters also but with a slight variation of wording.
[6844]
'A'isha reported that she beard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The people would be assembled on the Day of Resurrection barefooted, naked and uncircumcised. I said: Allah's Messenger, will the male and the female be together on the Day and would they be looking at one another? Upon this Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: 'A'isha, the matter would be too serious for them to look to one another.
[6845]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hatim b. Abi Saghira with the same chain of transmitters and there is no mention of the word "uncircum- cised."
[6846]
Ibn Abbas reported that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) deliver an address and he was saying that they would meet Allah barefooted, naked and uncircumcised.
[6847]
This hadith has been narrated through other chains of transmitters on the authority of Ibn Abbas, (and) the words are: While Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood up to deliver a sermon, he said: 0 people, Allah would make you assemble barefooted, naked and uncircumcised (and then recited the words of the Qur'an): "As We created you for the first time, We shall repeat it. (It is) a promise (binding) upon us. Lo ! We are to perform it, and the first person who would be clothed on the Day of Resurrection would be (Hadrat) Ibrahim (peace be upon him)" and, behold ! some persons of my Ummah would be brought and taken to the left and I would say: My Lord, they are my companions, and it would be said: You do not know what they did after you, and I would say just as the pious servant (Hadrat 'Isa) said: ,I was a witness regarding them as I remained among them and Thou art a witness over everything, so if Thou chastisest them, they are Thy servants and if Thou for- givest them, Thou art Mighty, Wise" (v. 117-118). And it would be said to him: They constantly turned to their heels since you left them. This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Waki' and Mu'adh (and the words are): "What new things they fabricated."
[6848]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying, The people will be assembled in three categories. Those desirous (of Paradise), fearing (Hell), coming two upon the came], three upon the camel, four upon the camel, ten upon the camel and the rest will be assembled, Hell-Fire being with them when they are at midday where they would spend the night and where they would spend the morning and where they would spend the evening.
[6849]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: When the people would stand before Allah. the Lord of the worlds, each one of them would stand submerged into perspiration up to half of his ears, and there is no mention of the "day" in the badlth transmitted on the authority of Ibn Muthanni.
[6850]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn 'Umar but with a slight variation of wording (and the words are) : "One of them would be completely submerged in perspiration up to half of his ears."
[6851]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as say- ing: The perspiration would spread on the Day of Resurrection upon the earth to the extent of seventy cubits and it would reach up to their mouths or up to their ears. Thaur is not sure (which words) he used (mouth or ears).
[6852]
Miqdad b. Aswad reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) as saying: On the Day of Resurrection, the sun would draw so close to the people that there woum be left only a distance of one mile. Sulaim b. Amir said: By Allah, I do not know whether he meant by "mile" the mile of the (material) earth or dn instrument used for applying collyrium to the eye. (The Holy Prophet is, however, reported to have said): The people would be submerged in perspiration according to their deeds, some up to their. knees, Some up to the waist and some would have the bridle of perspiration and, while saying this, Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) pointed his hand towards his mouth.
[6853]
'Iyad b. Him-ar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), while delivering a sermon one day, said: Behold, my Lord commanded me that I should teach you which you do not know and which He has taught me today. (He has instructed thus) : The property which I have conferred upon them is lawful for them. I have created My servants as one having a natural inclination to the worship of Allah but it is Satan who turns them away from the right religion and he makes unlawful what has been declared lawful for them and he commands them to ascribe partnership with Re, although he has no justification for that. And verily, Allah looked towards the people of the world and He showed hatred for the Arabs and the non-Arabs, but with the exception of some remnants from the People of the Book. And He (further) said: I have sent thee (the Holy Prophet) in order to put you to test and put (those to test) through y4Pu. And I sent the Book to you which cannot be washed away by water, so that you may recite it while in the state of wakefulness or sleep. Verily, Allah commanded me to burn (kill) the Quraish. I said: My Lord, they would break my head (like the tearing) of bread, and Allah said: You turn them out as they turned you out, you fight against them and We shall help you in this, you should spend and you would be conferred upon. You send an army and I would send an army five times greater than that. Fight against those who disobey you along with those who obey you. The inmates of Paradise are three: One who wields authority and is just and fair, one who Is truthful and has been endowed with power to do good deeds. And the person who is merciful and kind hearted towards his relatives and to every pious Muslim, and one who does not stretch his hand in spite of having a large family to support. And He said: The inmates of Hell are five: the weak who lack power to (avoid evil), the (carefree) who pursue (everything irrespective of the fact that it is good or evil) and who do not have any care for their family or for their wealth. And those dishonest whose greed cannot be concealed even in the case of minor things. And the third. who betray you. morning and evening, in regard to your family and your property. He also made a mention of the miser and the liar and those who are in the habit of abusing people and using obscene and foul language. Abu Ghassan in his narration did not make mention of "Spend and there would be spent for you."
[6854]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Qatada with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[6855]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of 'Iyad b. Himar that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave an address one day. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6856]
Iyad. b. Himar reported tbat, while Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was delivering an address, he stated that Allah commanded me The rest of the hadith is the same, and there is an addition in it : "Allah revealed to me that we should be humble amongst ourselves and none should show pride upon the others, And it does not behove one to do so, and He also said: There are among you people to follow not caring a bit for their family and property. Qatada said: Abu Abdullah, would this happen ? Thereupon he said: Yes. By Allah, I found this in the days of ignorance that a person grazed the goat of a tribe and did not find anyone but their slave-girl (and he did not spare her) but committed adultery with her.
[6857]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as say- ing: When any one of you dies, he is shown his seat (in the Hereafter) morning and evening; if he is amongst the inmates of Paradise (he is shown the seat) from amongst the inmates of Paradise and if he is one from amongst the denizens of Hell (he is shown the seat) from amongst the denizens of Hell, and it would be said to him: That is your seat until Allah raises you on the Day of Resurrection (and sends you to your proper seat).
[6858]
Ibn Umar reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: When a person dies, he is shown his seat morning and evening. If he is one amongst the inmates of Paradise (he is shown his seat) in Paradise and if he is one amongst the denizens of Hell-Fire (he is shown his seat) in the Hell-Fire. Then it is said to him: That is your seat where you would be sent on the Day of Resurrection.
[6859]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported: I did not hear this badith from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) directly but it was Zaid b. Thibit who narrated it from him. As Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) was going along with us towards the dwellings of Bani an-Najjar, riding upon his pony, it shied and he was about to fall. He found four, five or six graves there. He said: Who amongst you knows about those lying in the graves ? A person said: It is I. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: In what state did they die ? He said: They died as polytheists. He said : These people are passing through the ordeal in the graves. If it were not the reason that you would stop burying (your dead) in the graves on listening to the torment in the grave which I am listening to, I would have certainly made you hear that. Then turning his face towards us, he said: Seek refuge with Allah from the torment of Hell. They said : We seek refuge with Allah from the torment of Hell. He said: Seek refuge with Allah from the torment of the grave. They said: We seek refuge with Allali from the torment of the grave. He said : Seek refuge with Allah from turmoil, its visible and invisible (aspects), and they said : We seek refuge with Allah from turmoil and its visible and invisible aspects and he said : Seek refuge with Allah from the turmoil of the Dajjal, and they said We seek refuge with Allah from the turmoil of the Dajjal.
[6860]
Anas reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying : If you were not (to abandon) the burying of the dead (in the grave), I would have certainly supplicated Allah that He should make you listen the torment of the grave.
[6861]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Ayyub through some other chains of transmitters (and the words are) : "Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went out after the sun had set and he heard some sound and said: It is the Jews who are being tormented in their graves.
[6862]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) having said: When the servant is placed in his grave and his companions retrace their steps arid he hears the noise of the footsteps, then two angels come to him and make him sit and say to him: What you have to say about this person (the Holy Prophet) ? If he is d believer, lie would say: I bear testimony to the fact that he is a servant of Allali and His Messenger. Then it would be said to him: Look to your seat in the Hell- Fire, for Allah has substituted (the seat of yours) with a seat in Paradise. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He would be shown both the seats. Qatada said: It was mentioned to us that his grave (the grave of a believer) expands to seventy cubits and is full with verdure until the Day when they would be resurrected.
[6863]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: When the dead body. is placed in the grave, he listens to the sound of the shoes (as his friends and relatives return after burying him).
[6864]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: When the servant is placed in his grave and his friends retrace their steps. The rest of the liadith is the same as transmitted by Qatada.
[6865]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: This verse: "Allah grants steadfastness to those who believe with firm word," was rereaied in connection with the torment of the grave. It would be said to him: Who is your Lord? And he would say: Allah is my Lord and Muhammad is my Apostle (may peace be upon him), and that is (what is implied) by the words of Allah, the Exalted: "Allah keeps steadfast those who believe with firm word in this world and in the Hereafter."
[6866]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported that this verse: "Allah keeps steadfast those who believe with firm word in th;s world and the Hereafter," was revealed in con- nection with the torment of the grave.
[6867]
Abu Huraira reported: When the soul of a believer would go out (of his body) it would be received bv two angels who would take it to the sky. Hammad (one of the narrators in the chain of transmitters) mentioned the swetness of its odour, (and further said) that the dwellers of the sky say: Here comes the pious soul from the side of the earth Let there be blessings of Allah upon the body in which it resides. And it is carried (by the angels) to its Lord, the Exalted and Glorious. He would say: Take it to its destined end. And if he is a nonbeliever and as it (the soul) leaves the body-Hammad made a mention of its foul smell and of its being cursed-the dwellers of the sky say: There comes a dirty soul from the side of the earth, and it would be said: Take it to its destined end. Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) put a thin cloth which was with him upon his nose while making a mention (of the foul smell) of the soul of a non-believer.
[6868]
Anas b. Malik reported: We were along with Umar between Mecca and Medina that we began to look for the new moon. And I was a man with sharp eye- sight, so I could see it, but none except me saw it. I began to say to 'Umar: Don't you see it? But he would not see it. Thereupon Umar said: I would soon be able to see it (when it will shine more brightly). I lay upon bed. He then made a mention of the people of Badr to us and said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) showed us one day before (the actual battle) the place of death of the people (participating) in (the Battle) of Badr and he was saying: This would be the place of death of so and so tomorrow, if Allah wills. Umar said: By Him Who sent him with truth, they did not miss the places (of their death) which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had pointed for them. Then they were all thrown in a well one after another. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) then went to them and said: O, so and so, the son of so and so; O so and so, the son of so and so, have you found correct what Allah and His Messenger had promised you? I have, however, found absolutely true what Allah had promised with me. Umar said: Allah's Messenger, how are you talking with the bodies without soul in them. Thereupon he said: You cannot hear more distinctly than (their hearing) of what I say, but with this exception that they have not power to make any reply.
[6869]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) let the dead bodies of the unbelievers who fought in Badr (lie unburied) for three days. He then came to them and sat by their side and called them and said: O Abu Jahl b. Hisham, O Umayya b. Khalaf, O Utba b. Rab'ila, O Shaiba b. Rabi'a, have you not found what your Lord had promised with you to be correct? As for me, I have found the promises of my Lord to be (perfectly) correct. Umar listened to the words of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, how do they listen and respond to you? They are dead and their bodies have decayed. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: By Him in Whose Hand is my life, what I am saying to them, even you cannot hear more distinctly than they, but they lack the power to reply. Then'he commanded that they should be buried in the well of Badr.
[6870]
Aba Talha reported: When it was the Day of Badr and Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had gained victory over them (the Meccans), he commanded more than twenty persons, and in another hadith these are counted as twenty-four persons, from the non-believers of the Quraish to be thrown into the well of Badr. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6871]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who is taken to account on the Day of Resurrection is in fact put to torment. I said: Has Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, not said this: 'He will be made subject to an easy reckoning" (Ixxxiv. 8)? Thereupon he said: (What it implies) is not the actual reckoning, but only the presentation of one's deeds to Him. He who is thoroughly examined in reckoning is put to torment.
[6872]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ayyub with the same chain of transmitters.
[6873]
'A'isha reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Everyone who is reckoned thoroughly is undone. I said: Allah's Messenger, has Allah not called (reckoning) as easy reckoning? Thereupon he said.. It implies only presenta- tion of (one's deeds to Him), but if one is thoroughly examined in reckoning, he in fact is undone.
[6874]
'A'isha reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who is examined thoroughly In reckoning is undone.
[6875]
Jabir reported: I heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying three days before his death: None of you should court death but only hoping good from Allah
[6876]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[6877]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah al-Ansari reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say three days before his death: None of you should die but hoping only good from Allah, the Exalted and Glorious.
[6878]
Jabir reported: I heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying. Every servant would be raised (in the same very state) in which he dies.
[6879]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of A'mash but with a slight variation of wording.
[6880]
Abdullah b. Umar reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When Allah intends to chastise a people, He chastises all of them then they would be raised according to their deeds.
[6881]
Zainab bint Jahsh reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) got up from sleep saying: There is no god but Allah; there is a destruction in store for Arabia because of turmoil which is at hand, the barrier of Gog and Magog has opened so much. And Sufyan made a sign of ten with the help of his hand (in order to indicate the width of the gap) and I said: Allah's Messenger, would we be perished in spite of the fact that there would be good people amongst us? Thereupon he said: Of course, but only when the evil predominates.
[6882]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zainab bint Jahsh with a slight variation in the chain of transmitters.
[6883]
Zainab bint Jahsh, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported that one day Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came out in a state of excitement with his face quite red. And he was saying: There is no god but Allah; there is a destruction in store for Arabia beciuse of the turmoil which is near at hand as the barrier of Gog and Magog has been opened like it, and he (in order to explain it) made a ring with the help o his thumb and forefinger. I said: Allah's Messenger, would we be destroyed despite the fact that there would be pious people amongst us ? He said: Yes, when the evil would predominate.
[6884]
This hadith has been narrated oil the authority of Zuhri with a different chain of transmitters.
[6885]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Today the wall (barrier) of Gog and Magog has been opened so much, and WUhaib (in order to explain it) made the figure of ninety with the help of his hand.
[6886]
Harith b Abi Rabi'a and 'Abdullah b. Safwan both went to Umm Salama, the Mother of the Faithful, and they asked her about the army which would be sunk in the earth, and this relates to the time when Ibn Zubair (was the governor of Mecca). She reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had said that a seeker of refuge would seek refuge in the Sacred House and an army would be sent to him (in order to kill him) and when it would enter a plain ground, it would be made to sink. I said: Allah's Messenger, what about him who would be made to accompany this army willy nilly? Thereupon he said: He would be made to sink along with them buf he would be raised on the Day of Resurrection on the basis of his intention. Abu Ja'far said.' This plain,ground means the plain ground of Medina.
[6887]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah b. Rufai, with the same chain of transmitters (but with the addition of these words) : "When I met Abu Ja'far I told him that she (simply) meant the plain ground. Thereupon Abu Ja'far said : No, by God, she meant the plain ground of Medina.
[6888]
Abdullah b. Safwan reported that Hafsa told him that she had heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying : An army would attack this House in order to fight against the inhabitants of this House and when it would be at the plain ground the ranks in the centre of the army would be sunk and the vanguard would call the rear flanks of the army and they would also be sunk and no flank would be left except some people who would go to inform them (their kith and kin). A person (who had been listening to this badith from Abdullah b. Safwan) said: I bear testimony in regard to you that you are not imputing a lie to Hafsa. And I bear testimony to the fact that Hafsa is not telling a lie about Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[6889]
Abdullah b. Safwan reported the Mother of the Faithful as saying that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: They would soon seek protection in this House, viz. Ka'ba (the defenceless), people who would have nothing to protect themselves in the shape of weapons or the strength of the people. An army would be sent to fight (and kill) them and when they would enter a plain ground the army would be sunk in it. Yiisuf (one of the narrators) said: It was a people of Syria (hordes of Hajjaj) who had been on that day comin. towards Mecca for an attack (on 'Abdulllah b. Zubair) and Abdullah b. Safwan said: By God, it does not imply this army.
[6890]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was startled in the state of sleep. We said : Allah's Messenger, you have done something in the state of your sleep which you never did before, Thereupon he said: Strange it is that some, people of my Ummah would attack the House (Ka'ba) (for killing) a person who would belong to the tribe of the Quraish and he would try to seek protection in the House. And when they would reach the plain ground they would be sunk. We said: Allah's Messenger, all sorts of people throng the path. Thereupon he said: Yes, there would be amongst them people who would come with definite designs and those who would come under duress and there would be travellers also, but they would all be destroyed through one (stroke) of destruction. though they would be raised in different states (on the Day of Resurrection). Allah would, however, raise them according to their intention.
[6891]
Usama reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) climbed up a battlement amongst the battlements of Medina and then said: You do not see what I am seeing and I am seeing the places of turmoil between your houses as tile places of rainfall.
[6892]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.
[6893]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There will be soon a period of turmoil in which the one who sits will be better than one who stands and the one who stands will be better than one who walks and the one who walks will be better than one who runs. He who would watch them will be drawn by them. So he who finds a refuge or shelter against it should make it as his resort.
[6894]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira but with this variation of wording that in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Abu Bakr, there is an addition of these words: "There is a prayer among prayers ('Asr) and one who misses it is as if his family and property have been ruined."
[6895]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would be turmoil and the one who would sleep would be better than who would be awake and the one who would be awake would be better than one who would stand and one who would stand would be better than one who would run. So he who finds refuge or shelter should take that refuge or shelter.
[6896]
Abu Bakra reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would soon be turmoil. Behold ! there would be turmoil in which the one who would be seated would be better than one who would stand and the one who would stand would be better than one who would run. Behold ! when the turmoil comes or it appears, the one who has camel should stick to his camel and he who has sheep or goat should stick to his sheep and goat and he who has land should stick to the land. A person said: 'Allah's Messenger, what is your opinion about one who has neither camel nor sheep nor land ? Thereupon, he said : He should take hold of his sword and beat its edge with the help of stone and then try to find a way of escape. O Allah, I have conveyed (Thy Message); O Allah, I have conveyed (Thy Message); O Allah, I have conveyed (Thy Message). A person said: Allah's Messenger, what is your opinion it I am drawn to a rank in spite of myself, or in one of the groups and made to march and a man strikes with his sword or there comes an arrow and kills me ? Thereupon he said: He will bear the punishment of his sin and that of yours and he would be one amongst the denizens of Hell.
[6897]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Waki' with a slight variation of wording.
[6898]
Ahnaf b. Qais reported: I set out with the intention of helping this person (Hadrat 'Ali) that Abu Bakra met me. He said: Ahnaf, where do you intend to go? I said: I intend to help the cousin of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), viz. 'Ali. Thereupon he said to me: Ahnaf, go back, for I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When two Muslims confront one another with swords (in hands) both the slayer and the slain would be in Fire. He (Ahnaf) said: I said, or it was said: Allah's Messenger, it may be the case of one who kills. but what about the slain (why he would be put in Hell-Fire)? Thereupon he said: He also intended to kill his companion.
[6899]
Ahnaf b. Qais reported on the authority of Abu Bakra that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: When two Muslims confront each other with their swords, both the slayer and the slain are doomed to Hell-Fire.
[6900]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hammad through another chain of transmitters.
[6901]
Abu Bakra reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When two Muslims (confront each other) and the one amongst them attacks his brother with a weapon, both of them are at the brink of Hell-Fire. And when one of them kills his companion, both of them get into Hell-Fire.
[6902]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) many ahadith and one of them was this: The last Hour will not come until the two parties (of Muslims) confront each other and there is a large-scale massacre amongst them and the claim of both of them is the same.
[6903]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The last Hour will not come unless there is much bloodshed. They said: What is harj? Thereupon he said: Bloodshed. bloodshed.
[6904]
Thauban reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Allah drew the ends of the world near one another for my sake. And I have seen its eastern and western ends. And the dominion of my Unimah would reach those ends which have been drawn near me and I have been granted the red and the white trea- sure and I begged my Lord for my Ummah that it should not be destroyed because of famine, nor be dominated by an enemy who is not amongst them to take their lives and destroy them root and branch, and my Lord said: Muhammad, whenever I make a decision, there is none to change it. Well, I grant you for your Ummah that it would not be destroyed by famine and it would not be dominated by an enemy who would not be amongst it and would take their lives and destroy them root and branch even if all the people from the different parts of the world join hands together (for this purpose), but it would be from amongst them, viz. your Ummah, that some people would kill the others or imprison the others.
[6905]
Thauban reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said. Verily, Allah drew the ends of the world near me until I saw its cast and west an He bestowed upon me two treasures, the red and the white. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6906]
'Amir b. Sa'd reported on the authority of his father that one day Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came from a high, land. He passed by the mosque of Banu Mu'awiya, went in and observed two rak'ahs there and we also observed prayer along with him and he made a long supplication to his Lord. He then came to us and said: I asked my Lord three things and He has granted me two but has withheld one. I begged my Lord that my Ummah should not be destroyed because of famine and He granted me this. And I begged my Lord that my Ummah should not be destroyed by drowning (by deluge) and He granted me this. And I begged my Lord that there should be no bloodshed among the people of my Ummah. but He did not grant it.
[6907]
Amir b. Sa'd reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came with a group of his Companions and he passed by the mosque of Banu Mu'awiya. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6908]
Hudhaifa b. al-Yaman reported: By Allah, I have the best knowledge amongst people about every turmoil which is going to appear in the period intervening me and the Last Hour; and it is not for the fact that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) told me something confidentially pertaining to it and he did not tell anybody else about it, but it is because of the fact that I was present in the assembly in which he had been describing the turmoil. and he especially made a mention of three turmoils which would not spare anything and amongst these there would be turmoils like storms in the hot season. Some of them would be violent and some of them would be comparatively mild. Hudhaifa said: All (who were present) except I have gone (to the next world).
[6909]
Hudhaifa reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood before us one day and he did not leave anything unsaid (that he had to say) at that very spot which would happen (in the shape of turmoil) up to the Last Hour. Those who had to remember them preserved them in their minds and those who could not remember them forgot them. My friends knew them and there are certain things which slip out of my mind, but I recapitulate them when anyone makes a mention of them just as a person is lost from one's mind but is recalled to him on seeing his face.
[6910]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters up to the words: And he forgot who had to forget that and. he did not make a mention of what follows after this.
[6911]
Hudhaifa reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) informed me of what is going to happen before the approach of the Last Hour. And there is nothing that I did not ask him in this connection except this that I did not ask him as to what would turn the people of Medina out from Medina.
[6912]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[6913]
Abu Zaid (viz. Amr b. Akhtab) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) led us in the dawn prayer and then mounted the pulpit and addressed us until it was (time for the) noon prayer. He then came down the pulpit and observed prayer and then again mounted the pulpit and again addressed us until it was time for the 'Asr prayer. He then again came down and observed the prayer and again mointed the pulpit and addressed us until the sun was set and he informed (about) everything (pertaining to turmoil) that lay hidden in the past and what lies in (the womb) of) the future and the most learned amongst us is one who remembers them well
[6914]
Hudhaifa repotted: We were one day in the company of 'Umar that he said: Who amongst you has preserved in his mind most perfectly the hadith of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in regard to the turmoil as he told about it? I said: It is I. Thereupon he said: You are bold (enough to make this claim). And he further said: How? I said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would (first) be turmoil for a person in regard to his family, his property, his own self, his children, his neighbours (and the sins comnaitted in their connection) would be expiated by fasting, prayer, charity, enjoining good and prohibiting evil. Thereupon 'Umar said: I do not mean (that turmoil on a small scale) but that one which would eme-ge like the mounting waves of the ocean. I said: Commander of the Faithful, you have nothing to do with it, for the door is closed between you and that. He said: Would that door be broken or opened? I said: No, it would be broken. Thereupon he said: Then it would not be closed despite best efforts. We said to Hudhaifa: Did Umar know the door? Thereupon he said: Yes, he knew it (for certain) just as one knows that night precede the next day. And I narrated to him something in which there was nothing fabricated. Shaqiq (one of the narrators) said: We dared not ask Hudhaifa about that door. So we requested Masrdq to ask him. So he asked him and he said: (By that door, he meant) 'Umar.
[6915]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hudhaifa through other chains of transmitters also.
[6916]
Hudhaifa reported that Umar said: Who would narrate to us (the ahadith pertaining to turmoil) and he reported a badith similar to these ahadith.
[6917]
Jundub reported: I came on the day of Jara'a that a person was (found) sitting. I said: They would shed their blood today. That person said: By Allah. not at all. I said: By Allah, of course, they would do it. He said: By Allah, they would not do it. I said: By Allah, of course, they would do it. He said: By Allah, they would not do it, and I have heard a hadith of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) which I am narrating to you in this connection. I said: You are a bad seat fellow. I have been opposing you since morning and you are listening to me in spite of the fact that you have heard a hadith from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) (contrary to ray statement). I myself felt that there was no use of this annoyance. (He could tell me earlier that it was a hadith of the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him], and I would not have opposed him at all.) I turned my face toward him and asked him and he was Hadrat Hudhaifa.
[6918]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would not come before the Euphrates uncovers a mountain of gold, for which people would fight. Ninety-nine out of each one hundred would die but every man amongst them would say that perhaps he would be the one who would be saved (and thus possess this gold).
[6919]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Suhail with the same chain of transmitters but with this addition: "My father said: If you see that, do not even go near it."
[6920]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would not come unless the Euphrates would uncover a treasure of gold, so he who finds it should not take anything out of that.
[6921]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Euphrates would soon uncover a mountain of gold but he who is present there should not take anything from that.
[6922]
'Abdullah b. Harith b. Naufal reported: I was standing along with Ubayy b. Ka,b and he said: The opinions of the people differ in regard to the achievement of worldly ends. I said: Yes, of course. Thereupon he said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Euphrates would soon uncover a mountain of gold and when the people would bear of it they would flock towards it but the people who would possess that (treasure) (would say): If we allow these persons to take out of it they would take away the whole of it. So they would fight and ninety-nine out of one hundred would be killed. Abu Kamil in his narration said: I and Abu Ka'b stood under the shade of the battlement of Hassan.
[6923]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Iraq would withhold its dirhams and qafiz; Syria would withhold its mudd and dinar and Egypt would withhold its irdab and dinar and you would recoil to that position from where you started and you would recoil to that position from where you started and you would recoil to that position from where you started, the bones and the flesh of Abu Huraira would bear testimony to it.
[6924]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would not come until the Romans would land at al-A'maq or in Dabiq. An army consisting of the best (soldiers) of the people of the earth at that time will come from Medina (to counteract them). When they will arrange themselves in ranks, the Romans would say: Do not stand between us and those (Muslims) who took prisoners from amongst us. Let us fight with them; and the Muslims would say: Nay, by Allah, we would never get aside from you and from our brethren that you may fight them. They will then fight and a third (part) of the army would run away, whom Allah will never forgive. A third (part of the army). which would be constituted of excellent martyrs in Allah's eye, would be killed ani the third who would never be put to trial would win and they would be conquerors of Constantinople. And as they would be busy in distributing the spoils of war (amongst themselves) after hanging their swords by the olive trees, the Satan would cry: The Dajjal has taken your place among your family. They would then come out, but it would be of no avail. And when they would come to Syria, he would come out while they would be still preparing themselves for battle drawing up the ranks. Certainly, the time of prayer shall come and then Jesus (peace be upon him) son of Mary would descend and would lead them in prayer. When the enemy of Allah would see him, it would (disappear) just as the salt dissolves itself in water and if he (Jesus) were not to confront them at all, even then it would dissolve completely, but Allah would kill them by his hand and he would show them their blood on his lance (the lance of Jesus Christ).
[6925]
Mustaurid al-Qurashi reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would come (when) the Romans would form a majority amongst people. 'Amr said to him (Mustaurid Qurashi): See what you are saying? He said: I say what I heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). Thereupon he said: If you say that, it is a fact for they have four qualities. They have the patience to undergo a trial and immediately restore themselves to sanity after trouble and attack again after flight. They (have the quality) of being good to the destitute and the orphans, to the weak and, fifthly, the good quality in them is that they put resistance against the oppression of kings.
[6926]
Mustaurid Qurashi reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would come when the Romans would form a majority amongst people. This reached 'Amr b. al-'As and he said: What are these ahadith which are being transmitted from you and which you claim to have heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? Mustaurid said to him: I stated only that which I heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). Thereupon 'Amr said: If you state this (it is true), for they have the power of tolerance amongst people at the time of turmoil and restore themselves to sanity after trouble, and are good amongst people so far as the destitute and the weak are concerned.
[6927]
Yusair b. Jabir reported: Once there blew a red storm in Kufah that there came a person who had nothing to say but (these words): Abdullah b. Mas'ud, the Last Hour has come. He ('Abdullah b. Mas'ud) was sitting reclining against something, and he said: The Last Hour would not come until the people divide in- heritance and rejoice over booty, and then said pointing towards Syria, with the gesture of his hand like this: The enemy shall muster strength against Muslims and the Muslims will muster strength against them (Syrians). I said: You mean Rome? And he said: Yes, and there would be a terrible fight and the Muslims would prepare a detachment (for fighting unto death) which would not return but victorious. They will fight until night will intervene them; both the sides will return without being victorious and both will be wiped out. The Muslims will again prepare a detachment for fighting unto death so that they may not return but victorious. When it would be the fourth day, a new detachment out of the remnant of the Muslims would be prepared and Allah will decree that the enemy should be routed. And they would fight such a fight the like of which would not be seen, so much so that even if a bird were to pass their flanks, it would fall down dead before reaching the end of them. (There would be such a largescale massacre) that when counting would be done, (only) one out of a hundred men related to one another would be found alive. So what can be the joy at the spoils of such war and what inheritance would be divided ! They would be in this very state that they would hear of a calamity more horrible than this. And a cry would reach them: The Dajjil has taken your place among your off- spring. They will, therefore, throw away what would be in their hands and go forward sending ten horsemen,as a scouting party. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I know their names and the names of their forefathers and the colour of their horses. They will be best horsemen on the surface of the earth on that day or amongst the best horsemen on the surface of the earth on that day.
[6928]
Jabir reported: I was in the company of Ibn Mas'ud that there blew a red storm. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6929]
Jabir reported: I was in the house of 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud and the house was fully packed that a red storm blew in Kufah.
[6930]
Nafi' b. Utba reported: We were with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in an expedition that there came a people to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) from the direction of the west. They were dressed in woollen clothes and they stood near a hillock and they met him as Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was sitting. I said to myself: Better go to them and stand between him and them that they may not attack him. Then I thought that perhaps there had been going on secret negotiation amongst them. I however, went to them and btood between them and him and I remember four of the words (on that occasion) which I repeat (on the fingers of my hand) that he (Allah's Messenger) said: You will attack Arabia and Allah will enable you to conquer it, then you would attack Persia and He would make you to Conquer it. Then you would attack Rome and AllgLh will enable you to conquer it, then you would attack the Dajjal and Allah will enable you to conquer him. Nafi' said: Jabir, we thought that the Dajjal would appear after Rome (Syrian territory) would be conquered.
[6931]
Hudhaifa b. Usaid Ghifari reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to us all of a sudden as we were (busy in a discussion). He said: What do you discuss about? They (the Companions) said. We are discussing about the Last Hour. Thereupon he said: It will not cone until you see ten signs before and (in this connection) he made a mention of the smoke, Dajjal, the beast, the rising of the sun from the west, the descent of Jesus son of Mary (Allah be pleased with him), the Gog and Magog, and land-slidings in three places, one in the east, one in the west and one in Arabia at the end of which fire would burn forth from the Yemen, and would drive people to the place of their assembly.
[6932]
Hudhaifa b. Usaid reported: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) was in an apartment and we were beneath that that he peeped in and said to us: What are you discussing about? We said: (We are discussing about the Last) Hour. Thereupon he said: The Last Hour would not come until the ten signs dppear: land-sliding in the east, and land-sliding in the west, and land-sliding in the peninsula of Arabia, the smoke, the Dajjal, the beast of the earth, Gog and Magog, the rising of the sun from the west and the fire which would emit from the lower part of 'Adan. Shu'ba said that 'Abd al-'Aziz b. Rufai' reported on the authority of Abu Tufail who reported on the authority of Abu Sariha a hadith like this that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) did not make a mention of (the tenth sign) but he said that out of the ten one was the descent of Jesus Christ, son of Mary (peace be upon him), and in another version it is theb lowing of the violent gale which would drive the people to the ocean.
[6933]
Abu Sariha reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was in an (upper) apartment and we were standing lower to him and discussing (about the Last Hour). The rest of the hadith is the same, and Shu'ba said: I think he also said these words: The fire would descend along with them where they would land and where they would take rest (during midday (it would also cool down for a while). Shu'ba said: This hadith has been transmitted to me through Abu Tufail and Abu Sariha and none could trace it back directly to Allah's Apostle (may peace b.. upon him). However, there is a mention of the descent of Jesus Christ son of Mary in one version and in the other there is a mention of the blowing of a violent would drive them to the ocean.
[6934]
Abu Sariha reported: We were discussing the Last Hour) that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) looked towards us. The rest of the hadith is the same and the tenth (sign) was the descent of Jesus Christ son of Mary, and Shu'ba said: 'Abd al-'Aziz did not trace it directly to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[6935]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger may peace be upon him) said: The Last Hour would not come until fire emits from the earth of Hijaz which would illuminate the necks of the camels of the Busra.
[6936]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: (The Last Hour would not come) until the habitations of Medina would extend to Ihab or Yahab. Zubair said: I said to Suhail how far these were from Medina. He said: So and so miles.
[6937]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The famine would not break otit because of drought, but there would be famine despite heavy rainfall as nothing would grow from the earth.
[6938]
Ibn 'Umar reported that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying (in a state) that he had turned his face towards the east: Behold, turmoil would appear from this side, from where the horns of Satan would appear.
[6939]
Ibn 'Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood by the door (of the apartment of) gafsa and, pointing towards the east, he said: The turmoil would appear from this side, viz. where the horns of Satan would appear, and he uttered these words twice or thrice and Ubaidullah b. Sa'ld in his narration said. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had been standing by the door of 'A'isha.
[6940]
Salim b. Abdullah reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), while turning his face towards the east, said: The turmoil would appear from this side; verily, the turmoil would appear from this side; verily, the turmoil. would appear from this side-the side where appear the horns of Satan.
[6941]
Ibn Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came out from the house of 'A'isha and said: It would be from this side that there would appear the height of unbelief, viz. where appear the horns of Satan. i.e. cast.
[6942]
Ibn Umar reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying while pointing his hands towards the east: The turmoil would appear from this side; verily, the turmoil would appear from this side (he repeated it thrice) where appear the horns of Satan.
[6943]
Ibn Fudail reported on the authority of his father that he heard Salim b. 'Abdullah b. 'Umar as saying: O people of Iraq, how strange it is that you ask about the minor sins but commit major sins? I heard from my father 'Abdullah b. 'Umar, narrating that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying while pointing his hand towards the east: Verily. the turmoil would come from this side, from where appear the horns of Satan and you would strike the necks of one another; and Moses killed a person from among the people of Pharaoh unintentionally and Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said: "You killed a person but We relieved you from the grief and tried you with (many a) trial" (xx. 40). Ahmad b. Umar reported this hadith from Salim, but he did not make a mention of the words: "I heard".
[6944]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would not come until the women of the tribe of Daus would be seen going round Dhi al-Khalasa (for worship) and Dhi al-Khalasa is a place in Tabala, where there was a temple in which the people of the tribe of Daus used to worship the idol.
[6945]
'A'isha reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The (system) of night and day would not end until the people have taken to the worship of Lat and 'Uzza. I said: Allah's Messenger, I think when Allah has revealed this verse: "He it is Who has sent His Messenger with right guidance, and true religion, so that He may cause it to prevail upon all religions, though the polytheists are averse (to it)" (ix. 33), it implies that (this promise) is going to be fulfilled. Thereupon he (Allah's Apostle) said: It would happen as Allah would like. Then Allah would send the sweet fragrant air by which everyone who has even a mustard grain of faith in Him would die and those only would survive who would have no goodness in them. And they would revert to the religion of their forefathers.
[6946]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Ja'far with the same chain of transmitters.
[6947]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would not come until a person would pass by a grave of another person and he would say: I wish it had been my abode.
[6948]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: By Him, in Whose hand is my life, the world would not come to an end until a person would pass by a grave, would roll over it and express the desire that he should be in the place of the occupant of that grave not because of religious reasons but because of this calamity.
[6949]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: By Him in Whose Hand is my life, a time would come when the murderer would not know why he has committed the murder, and the victim would not know why he has been killed.
[6950]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The world would not come to an end until a day would come to the people on which the murderer would not know as to why he has killed and the slain would not know as to why he has been murdered. It would be said: Why would It happen? To which he replied: It would be because of general massacre and bloodshed. And the slaughterers and the slain would be in Fire, and in the narration of Ibn Aban, the name of Abu Isma'il has been mentioned.
[6951]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) as saying: The Ka'ba would be destroyed by an Abyssinian having two small shanks.
[6952]
(The above mentioned) hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters.
[6953]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It would be an Abyssinian having two small shanks who would destroy the House ol Allah, the Exalted and Glorious.
[6954]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messengar (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would not come before a person of Qahtan comes forth driving people with his stick.
[6955]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The day and the night would not come to an end before a man called al-Jahjah would occupy the throne.
[6956]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would not come unless you fight with people whose faces are like hammered shields and the Last Hour would not come until you would fight against those wearing the shoes of hair.
[6957]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would not come until a people wearing shoes of hair fight against you having their faces like hammered shields.
[6958]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would not come until you fight with a people wearing shoes of hair and the Last Hour would not come until you fight with a people having small eyes and broad snub noses.
[6959]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would not come until the Muslims fight with the Turks-a people whose faces would be like hammered shields wearing clothes of hair and walking (with shoes) of hair.
[6960]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: You shall fight in the hours to come against a nation wearing shoes made of hair and faces like hammered shields, with red complexion and small eyes.
[6961]
Abu Nadra reported:"We were in the company of Jabir b. 'Abdulldh that he said it may happen that the people of Iraq may not send their qafiz and dirhams (their measures of food stuff and their money). We said : Who would be respolisible for it? He said: The non_Arabs would prevt them. He again said: There is the possibility that the people of Syria may not send their dinar and mudd. We said: Who would be responsible for it? He said This prevention would be made by the Romans. He (Jabir b. Abdullab) kept quiet for a while and then reported Allah',s Messengdt (may peas be upon him) having said There would be a caliph in the last(period) of my Ummah who would freely give handfuls of wealth to thd people wiothout counting it. I said to Abu Nadra and Abu al-'Ala: DO you mean 'Umarb. 'Abd al-Aziz ? They said: No (he would be Imam Mahdi.).
[6962]
This hadith hab been narrated by Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters.
[6963]
Abu Sa'id reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) I said: There would be amongest your caliphs a caliph who would give handfuls of wealth to the, but wbuld not count it. In. the narration transmitted on the authority of Ibn Hujr, there is a slight variation of wording.
[6964]
Abu Sa'id and Jabir b. Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: There would be in the last phase of the time a caliph who would distribute wealth but would not count.
[6965]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Sa'id through another chain of transmitters.
[6966]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported: One who Is better than I informed me, that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to 'Ammar as he was digging the ditch (on the ocasion of the Battle of the Ditch) wiping over his head: O son of Summayya you will be involved in trouble and a group of the rebels would kill you.
[6967]
This hadith has been transmitted on the same authority but with this variation that the hadith trarismitted on the authority of Nabra (the words are): One Who is better than I informed me, and he was Abu Qatatda, and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Khalid instead of the word 'bu_us' there is 'dys' or 'yadis', i.e.: "how sad it is".
[6968]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Umm Salama that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to 'Ammar: A group of rebels would kill you.
[6969]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Umm Salam through another chain of transmitters.
[6970]
Unmm Salama reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: A band of rebels would kill 'Ammar.
[6971]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: This tribe of the Quraish would kill (people) of wy Ummah. They (the Companions) said:What us to do(in such a situations)? Thereupon he said: Would that the people remain aside from them (and not besmear their hand with the blood of the Muslim).
[6972]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[6973]
Abu Huraira reported that Allh's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: (Khusrau king of Persia) would die and Qaisar (Ceasar King of Rome) would die; there would be no Qaisar after him, but, by one in Whose Hand is my life, you would spend their treasures in the cause of Allah.
[6974]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Zuhri.
[6975]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported: This is what Abu Huraira reported from Allah's messenger (may peace be upon him) and in this connection he reported so many hadith (and one of them was this) : Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Kisra would die and then there would be no Kisra after him. Qaisar would die and there would be no Qaisar after him, but you will distribute their threasuers in thecause of Allah.
[6976]
Jabir b. Samura reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: When Kisra would die there would be no Kisra after him; the rest of the hadith is the same as Abu Huraira reported.
[6977]
Jabir b. Samura reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (as sayingt There would lie open for a group of Muslims, or for a group of believers, the treasures of the family of Kisra which would be in the whit (palace). In a version of Qutaiba there is definitely the word "Muslim".
[6978]
Jabir b. Samura reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a hadith like this.
[6979]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace he upon him) saying: You have heard about a city the one side of which is in the land and the other is in the sea (Constantinople). They said: Allall's Messenger, yes. Thererupon he said: The Last Hour would not cmoe unlesss seventy thousand persons from Bani lsra'il would attack it. When they would land there, they will neither fight with weapons nor would shower arrows but would only say: "There is no god but Allah and Allah is the Greatest," that one side of it would fall. Thaur (one of the narrators) said: I think that he said: The part by the side of the ocean. Then they would say for the second time: "There is no god but Allah and Allah is the Greatest" that the second side would also fall, and they would say: "There is no god but Allah and Allah is the Greatest," that the gates would be opened for them and they would enter therein and, they would be collecting spoils of war and distributing them amongst themselves that a noise would be heard and It would be said: Verily, Dajjal has come. And thus they would leave everything there and would turn to him.
[6980]
Thaur b. Zaid has narrated this hadith with the same chain of transmitters.
[6981]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: You will fight against the Jews and you will kill them until even a stone would say: Come here, Muslim, there is a Jew (hiding himself behind me); kill him.
[6982]
Ubaidullah has reported this hadith with this chain of transmitters (and the Words are): "There is a Jew behind me."
[6983]
Abdullah b. 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: You and the Jews would fight against one another until a stone would say: Muslim, here is a Jew behind me; come and kill him.
[6984]
Abdullah b. 'Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The Jews will fight against you and you will gain victory over them until the stone would say: Muslim, here is a Jew behind me; kill him.
[6985]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The last hour would not come unless the Muslims will fight against the Jews and the Muslims would kill them until the Jews would hide themselves behind a stone or a tree and a stone or a tree would say: Muslim, or the servant of Allah, there is a Jew behind me; come and kill him; but the tree Gharqad would not say, for it is the tree of the Jews.
[6986]
Jabir b. Samura reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Before the Last Hour there would be many liars, and there is an addition in the badith transmitted on the authority of Abu Ahwas of these words: "I said to him: Did you hear it from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? He said: Yes."
[6987]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Simak with the same chain of transmitters. and Simak said: I heard my brother say that jabir had stated: Be on your guard against them.
[6988]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour would not come until there would arise about thirty impostors, liars, and each one of them would claim that he is a messenger of Allah.
[6989]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira with a slight variation of wording.
[6990]
'Abdullah reported: We were along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that we happened to pass by children amongst whom there was Ibn Sayyad. The children made their way but Ibn Sayyad kept sitting there (and it seemed) as if Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not like it (his sitting with the children) and said to him: May your nose he besmeared with dust, don't you bear testimony to the fact that I am the Messenger of Allah? Thereupon he said: No, but you should bear testimony that I am the messenger of Allah. Thereupon 'Umar b. Khattab said: Allah's Messenger, permit me that I should kill him. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: If he is that person who is in your mind (Dajjal ), you will not be able to kill him.
[6991]
'Abdullah reported: We were walking with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that Ibn Sayyad happened to pass by him. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: I have concealed for you (something to test you, so tell me that). He said: It is Dukh. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Be off. You cannot get farther than your rank, whereupon 'Umar said: Allah's Messenger, permit me to strike his neck. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Leave him; if he is that one (Dajjal) whom you apprehend, you will not be able to kill him.
[6992]
Abu Sa'id reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) met him (Ibn Sayyad) and so did Abu Bakr and 'Umar on some of the roads of Medina. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Do you bear testimony to the fact that I am the Messenger of Allah? Thereupon he said: Do you bear testimony to the fact that I am the messenger of Allah? Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I affirm my faith in Allah and in His Angels and in His Books, and what do you see ? He said: I see the throne over water. Whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: You see the throne of Iblis upon the water, and what else do you see? He said: I see two truthfuls and a liar or two liars and one truthful. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Leave him He has been confounded.
[6993]
Jabir b 'Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) met Ibn Sa'id(Sayyad) and there were with him Abu Bakr and 'Umar and Ibn Sayyad was in the company of children. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6994]
Abu Sa'id reported: I accompanied Ibn Sayyad to Mecca and he said to me: What I have gathered from people is that theu think that I am Dajjal. Have you not hearde Allah's Messenger (may peace upon him) as saying: He will have no no children, I said: Yes, of course. Thereupon he said: But I have children. Have you not heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He would not enter Mecca and Medina? I said: Yes, of course. Thereupon he said I have been once in Medina and now I intend to go to Mecca. And he said to me at the end of his talk: By Allah: I know his place of birth his abode where he is just now. He (Abu Sa'id) said: This caused confusion in my mind (in regard to his identity).
[6995]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported:Ibn Sa'id said to me somethhing for which I felt ashamed. He said: I can excuse others; but what has gone wrong with you, O Companions of Muhammad, that you take me as Dajjal? Has Allah's Apostle(may peace be upon him) not said that he would be a Jew whereas I am a Muslim and he also said that he would not have children, whereas I have children, and he also said: veryly, Allah has prohibited him to enter Mecca whereas I have performed Pilgrimage, atid.he went on saying this that I was about to be impressed by his tallk. He (however) said this also: I know where he (Dajjal) is and I know his father abd I mother, and it was said to him: Won't you feel pleased if you would be the same person? Thereupon he said: If this offer is made to me, I would noT resent that.
[6996]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported : We came back after having pewrformed Pilgrimage or 'Umra and lbn Sa'id was along with us. And w,e encamped at a place and the people dispersed and I and he were left behind. I felt terribly frightend from him as it was said about him that he was the Dajjal. He brought his goods and placed them by my luggage and I said: It is intense heat. Would you not place that under that tree? And he did that. Then ther appeared before us a flock of sheep. He went and brought a cup of milk and said: Abu Sa'id, drink that. I said it is intense heat and the milk is also hot (whereas the fact was) that I did not like to drink from his hands or to opr to take it from his hand and he said: Abu Sa'id, I think that I should take a rope and suspend it by the tree and then coimmit sucide because of the talks of the people, and he furtlier said. Abu Sa'id he who is ingnoran of the saying of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (he is to be pardoned), but O people of Ansar, is this hadith of Allah's Messengern(may peace be upon him) concealed from you whereas you have the best konowledge of t this hadith of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) amongst people? Did Allalt's Messenger (may peace be upon him) not say that he(Dajjal) would be a non believer whereas I am a believer? did Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) not say he would be barren and no child would be born to hirn, whereas I have left my children in Medina? Did Allh's Messenger (may peace upon him) not say: He would not get into Medina and Mecca whereas I have been coming from Medina and now I intend to go to Mecca? Abu Sa'id said: I was about to accept the excuse put forward by him. that he said: I know the place where he would be born and where he is now. So I said to him: May your whole dayb be spent
[6997]
This hadith has transmitted on the authority of Abu Sa'id that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) asked Ibn Sa'id about the earth of Paradise. Thereupon he said: Abu'l-Qasim, It is like a fine white musk,whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said : 'You have told the the truth.
[6998]
Abu Sa'id reported that Ibn Sayyad asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about the earth of Paradise. Whereupon he said: It is like white shining pure musk.
[6999]
'Muhammad b. Munkadir reported: As I saw Jabir b. 'Abdullah taking an oath in the name of Allah that it was Ibn Sa'id who was the Dajjal I said:Do you take an oath in the name of Allah? Thereupon he said:I heard 'Umar taking an oath in the presence of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) to this effect but Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) did not disapprove of it.
[7000]
'Abdullah b. Umar reported: 'Umar b. Khattab went along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in the company of some persons toIbn Sayyad that he found him playing with children near the bettlement of Bani Maghala and Ibn Sayyad was at that time just at the threshold of adolescence and he did not perceive (the presence of Holy Prophet) until Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)struck his back with his hands.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Ibn Sayyad,don't you bear witness that I am the messenger of Allah? Ibn Sayyad looked toward him and he said: I bear witness to the fact that you the messenger of the unlettered.Ibn Sayyad said to the Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him):Do you bear witness to the fact that I am the messenger of Allah? Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) rejected this and said :I affirm my faith in Allah and in His messengers .Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: What do you see? Ibn Sayyad said :It us a Dukh. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : May you be disgraced and dishonoured,you would not not be able to go beyond your rank. 'Umar b. Khattab said :Allah's Messenger, permit me that I should strike his neck. Therupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said :If he is the same (Dajjal) who would appear near the Last Hour,you would not be able to overpower him, and he is not that ther is no good for you to kill him. 'Abdullah b. 'Umar further narrated that after some time Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and Ubayy b. Ka'b went towards the palm trees where Ibn Sayyad was. When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went near the tree he hid himself behind a tree with the intention of hearing something from Ibn sayyad before Ibn Sayyad could see him, but Allah's Messenger (may pcxce be upon him) saw him on a bed with a blanket around him from which a murmuring sound was being heard and Ibn Sayyad's mother saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) behind the trunk of the palm tree. She said to Ibn Sayyad: Saf (that being his name), here is Muhammad. Thereupon Ibn Sayyad jumped up murmuring and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: If she had left him alone he would have made things clear. Abdullah b. Umar told that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood up amongst the people and lauded Allah as He deserved, then he made a mention of the Dajjal and said: I warn you of him and there is no Prophet who has not warned his people against the Dajjal. Even Noah warned (against him) but I am going to tell you a thing which no Prophet told his people. You must know that he (the Dajjal) is one-eyed and Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, is not one-eyed. Ibn Shihab said: 'Umar b. Thabit al-Ansari informed me that some of the Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) informed him that the day when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) warned people against the Dajjal, he also said: There would be written between his two eyes (the word) Kafir (infidel) and everyone who would resent his deeds would be able to read or every Muslim would be about to read, and he also said: Bear this thing in mind that none amongst you would be able to see Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, until he dies.